4274 | damage (noun): a change for the worse, harm done | loc: hasar
  EN TS: Just a "little" damage.
  tr TS: Sadece "biraz" hasar.
  EN FS: Just a "little" snow.
  tr FS: Sadece "biraz" kar.
  EN TP: damage to a parked car
  tr TP: park hâlindeki arabada hasar
  EN FP: damage to a bicycle
  tr FP: bisiklette hasar
4275 | complain (verb): to express displeasure or unhappiness | loc: şikâyet etmek
  EN TS: She is complaining about the car.
  tr TS: Arabadan şikâyet ediyor.
  EN FS: She is complaining about the bike.
  tr FS: Bisikletten şikâyet ediyor.
  EN TP: to complain about a crash
  tr TP: kazadan şikâyet etmek
  EN FP: to complain about the food
  tr FP: yemekten şikâyet etmek
4276 | elderly (adjective): advanced in years, old | loc: yaşlı
  EN TS: An elderly lady is going home.
  tr TS: Yaşlı bir kadın eve gidiyor.
  EN FS: An elderly man is going home.
  tr FS: Yaşlı bir adam eve gidiyor.
  EN TP: an elderly woman walking
  tr TP: yürüyen yaşlı bir kadın
  EN FP: an elderly woman dancing
  tr FP: dans eden yaşlı bir kadın
4277 | accountant (noun): someone who keeps and checks business accounts | loc: muhasebeci
  EN TS: The accountant found it!
  tr TS: Muhasebeci buldu!
  EN FS: The accountant lost it!
  tr FS: Muhasebeci kaybetti!
  EN TP: an accountant with receipts
  tr TP: fişlerle bir muhasebeci
  EN FP: an accountant on holiday
  tr FP: tatildeki bir muhasebeci
4279 | theatre (noun): a building where plays or films are shown | loc: tiyatro
  EN TS: Nobody came to the theatre!
  tr TS: Tiyatroya kimse gelmedi!
  EN FS: Nobody came to the stadium!
  tr FS: Stadyuma kimse gelmedi!
  EN TP: a theatre stage
  tr TP: tiyatro sahnesi
  EN FP: a theatre ticket
  tr FP: tiyatro bileti
4280 | filming (noun): the act of making a film | loc: çekim
  EN TS: Filming day: she is in tears.
  tr TS: Çekim günü: hüngür hüngür ağlıyor.
  EN FS: Filming day: she is laughing.
  tr FS: Çekim günü: kahkahalarla gülüyor.
  EN TP: filming a sad scene
  tr TP: hüzünlü bir sahnenin çekimi
  EN FP: filming a cooking show
  tr FP: yemek programı çekimi
4281 | change (noun): when something passes from one state to another | loc: değişim
  EN TS: The colour change is amazing.
  tr TS: Renk değişimi muhteşem.
  EN FS: The size change is amazing.
  tr FS: Boyut değişimi muhteşem.
  EN TP: a change of colour
  tr TP: renk değişimi
  EN FP: a change of clothes
  tr FP: kıyafet değişimi
4282 | shelter (noun): a place that cares for animals with no home | loc: barınak
  EN TS: They got a dog from a shelter.
  tr TS: Barınaktan bir köpek sahiplendiler.
  EN FS: They got a cat from a shelter.
  tr FS: Barınaktan bir kedi sahiplendiler.
  EN TP: a dog from a shelter
  tr TP: barınaktan bir köpek
  EN FP: a shelter from the rain
  tr FP: yağmura karşı bir barınak
4283 | cooking (noun): preparing food with heat | loc: yemek pişirme
  EN TS: Her cooking gets applause!
  tr TS: Yemek pişirmesi alkış topluyor!
  EN FS: Her singing gets applause!
  tr FS: Şarkı söylemesi alkış topluyor!
  EN TP: a cooking class
  tr TP: yemek pişirme kursu
  EN FP: a cooking contest
  tr FP: yemek pişirme yarışması
4284 | rush (noun): the act of moving hurriedly and carelessly | loc: acele
  EN TS: He is leaving in a rush!
  tr TS: Aceleyle gidiyor!
  EN FS: He is leaving in a car!
  tr FS: Arabayla gidiyor!
  EN TP: a morning rush
  tr TP: sabah acelesi
  EN FP: a rush hour
  tr FP: yoğun trafik saati
4285 | adult (noun): a fully grown person | loc: yetişkin
  EN TS: Adult life means bills.
  tr TS: Yetişkin hayatı demek fatura demek.
  EN FS: Adult life means games.
  tr FS: Yetişkin hayatı demek oyun demek.
  EN TP: an adult going to work
  tr TP: işe giden bir yetişkin
  EN FP: an adult going to bed
  tr FP: yatmaya giden bir yetişkin
4286 | fan (verb): to move the air with something, like a fan | loc: yelpazelemek
  EN TS: She is fanning herself.
  tr TS: Kendini yelpazeliyor.
  EN FS: She is fanning the cat.
  tr FS: Kediyi yelpazeliyor.
  EN TP: fanning herself in the heat
  tr TP: sıcakta kendini yelpazelemek
  EN FP: fanning a barbecue fire
  tr FP: mangal ateşini yelpazelemek
4287 | view (verb): to look at something carefully | loc: incelemek
  EN TS: They are viewing the flat.
  tr TS: Daireyi inceliyorlar.
  EN FS: They are viewing the car.
  tr FS: Arabayı inceliyorlar.
  EN TP: viewing an empty flat
  tr TP: boş bir daireyi incelemek
  EN FP: viewing a used car
  tr FP: ikinci el bir arabayı incelemek
4288 | target (noun): a point or object to shoot at | loc: hedef
  EN TS: She is focusing on the target.
  tr TS: Hedefe odaklanıyor.
  EN FS: She is focusing on the camera.
  tr FS: Kameraya odaklanıyor.
  EN TP: three round targets
  tr TP: üç yuvarlak hedef
  EN FP: a target on a wall
  tr FP: duvarda bir hedef
4289 | cold (noun): the absence of heat | loc: soğuk
  EN TS: The cold is blowing her back!
  tr TS: Soğuk onu geriye itiyor!
  EN FS: The heat is blowing her back!
  tr FS: Sıcak onu geriye itiyor!
  EN TP: a blast of cold
  tr TP: buz gibi bir soğuk dalgası
  EN FP: a cold drink
  tr FP: soğuk bir içecek
4290 | cool (verb): to make something cool or cooler | loc: serinletmek
  EN TS: Cold air is cooling him down.
  tr TS: Soğuk hava onu serinletiyor.
  EN FS: Cold beer is cooling him down.
  tr FS: Soğuk bira onu serinletiyor.
  EN TP: cooling down under the vent
  tr TP: havalandırmanın altında serinlemek
  EN FP: cooling a drink with ice
  tr FP: buzla içecek serinletmek
4291 | forehead (noun): the part of the face above the eyes | loc: alın | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is cooling his forehead. So hot!
  tr TS: Alnını serinletiyor. Çok sıcak!
  EN FS: He is cooling his feet. So hot!
  tr FS: Ayaklarını serinletiyor. Çok sıcak!
  EN TP: a glass on his forehead
  tr TP: alnında bir bardak
  EN FP: a kiss on the forehead
  tr FP: alnına bir öpücük
4292 | breeze (noun): a slight, refreshing wind | loc: esinti
  EN TS: A breeze is moving her hair.
  tr TS: Esinti saçlarını savuruyor.
  EN FS: A fan is moving her hair.
  tr FS: Vantilatör saçlarını savuruyor.
  EN TP: a breeze in the meadow
  tr TP: çayırda bir esinti
  EN FP: a breeze by the sea
  tr FP: deniz kenarında bir esinti
4293 | jet (noun): an airplane powered by jet engines | loc: jet
  EN TS: The jet is taking off!
  tr TS: Jet havalanıyor!
  EN FS: The jet is landing!
  tr FS: Jet iniş yapıyor!
  EN TP: a jet taking off
  tr TP: havalanan bir jet
  EN FP: a jet of water
  tr FP: bir su jeti
4294 | low (adverb): in a low position, near the ground | loc: alçaktan
  EN TS: The plane is flying very low!
  tr TS: Uçak çok alçaktan uçuyor!
  EN FS: The kite is flying very low!
  tr FS: Uçurtma çok alçaktan uçuyor!
  EN TP: flying low over him
  tr TP: onun üstünden alçaktan uçmak
  EN FP: flying low over the sea
  tr FP: denizin üstünden alçaktan uçmak
4295 | photograph (verb): to take a picture on film or a camera | loc: fotoğrafını çekmek
  EN TS: Look, he's photographing a plane!
  tr TS: Bak, uçağın fotoğrafını çekiyor!
  EN FS: Look, he's photographing a camel!
  tr FS: Bak, devenin fotoğrafını çekiyor!
  EN TP: photographing a landing jet
  tr TP: inen bir jetin fotoğrafını çekmek
  EN FP: photographing the desert sand
  tr FP: çöl kumunun fotoğrafını çekmek
4296 | signal (noun): a gesture or action that sends a message | loc: işaret
  EN TS: Raised wands send a signal.
  tr TS: Kaldırılan çubuklar işaret veriyor.
  EN FS: Raised flags send a signal.
  tr FS: Kaldırılan bayraklar işaret veriyor.
  EN TP: a signal to the pilot
  tr TP: pilota bir işaret
  EN FP: a weak phone signal
  tr FP: zayıf bir telefon sinyali
4297 | departure (noun): the act of leaving, departing | loc: ayrılış | checker: word_missing? | translator note: loc "ayrılış" unnatural for a departures board; used "kalkış"
  EN TS: The departures board is huge!
  tr TS: Kalkış tablosu kocaman!
  EN FS: The arrivals board is huge!
  tr FS: Varış tablosu kocaman!
  EN TP: a huge departures board
  tr TP: kocaman bir kalkış tablosu
  EN FP: a departure by train
  tr FP: trenle ayrılış
4298 | straight (adverb): in a direct line, without deviation | loc: düz
  EN TS: Boys are lining up straight.
  tr TS: Erkek çocuklar düz bir sıraya giriyor.
  EN FS: Girls are lining up straight.
  tr FS: Kız çocuklar düz bir sıraya giriyor.
  EN TP: lining up straight
  tr TP: düz bir sıraya girmek
  EN FP: going straight home
  tr FP: dosdoğru eve gitmek
4299 | react (verb): to show a response to something | loc: tepki vermek
  EN TS: He reacts to cats. Poor guy.
  tr TS: Kedilere tepki veriyor. Garibim.
  EN FS: He reacts to dogs. Poor guy.
  tr FS: Köpeklere tepki veriyor. Garibim.
  EN TP: reacting to a cat
  tr TP: bir kediye tepki vermek
  EN FP: reacting to bad news
  tr FP: kötü habere tepki vermek
4300 | rubbish (noun): worthless material to be thrown away | loc: çöp
  EN TS: Rubbish everywhere!
  tr TS: Her yer çöp!
  EN FS: Flowers everywhere!
  tr FS: Her yer çiçek!
  EN TP: bins heaped with rubbish
  tr TP: çöple dolup taşan konteynerler
  EN FP: rubbish on a beach
  tr FP: sahilde çöp
4301 | gap (noun): an empty space between things | loc: boşluk
  EN TS: He is squeezing through a gap.
  tr TS: Bir boşluktan sıkışarak geçiyor.
  EN FS: He is crawling through a gap.
  tr FS: Bir boşluktan sürünerek geçiyor.
  EN TP: squeezing through a narrow gap
  tr TP: dar bir boşluktan sıyrılmak
  EN FP: a gap in the fence
  tr FP: çitteki bir boşluk
4302 | emergency (noun): a sudden crisis that needs immediate action | loc: acil durum
  EN TS: An emergency in the rain.
  tr TS: Yağmurda bir acil durum.
  EN FS: An emergency in the snow.
  tr FS: Karda bir acil durum.
  EN TP: an emergency at night
  tr TP: gece bir acil durum
  EN FP: an emergency exit door
  tr FP: acil durum çıkış kapısı
4303 | medical (adjective): relating to medicine and doctors | loc: tıbbi
  EN TS: A medical team is crossing.
  tr TS: Tıbbi bir ekip karşıya geçiyor.
  EN FS: A police team is crossing.
  tr FS: Bir polis ekibi karşıya geçiyor.
  EN TP: a medical team crossing
  tr TP: karşıya geçen tıbbi ekip
  EN FP: a medical exam at school
  tr FP: okulda tıbbi muayene
4304 | football (noun): the oval ball used in American football | loc: Amerikan futbolu topu
  EN TS: He threw the football, nice.
  tr TS: Amerikan futbolu topunu fırlattı, helal.
  EN FS: He kicked the football, nice.
  tr FS: Amerikan futbolu topuna tekme attı, helal.
  EN TP: an oval football mid-air
  tr TP: havada Amerikan futbolu topu
  EN FP: a round football on grass
  tr FP: çimde yuvarlak bir futbol topu
4305 | boy (noun): a young male person | loc: çocuk
  EN TS: The boy got a huge burger.
  tr TS: Çocuğa kocaman bir burger geldi.
  EN FS: The boy got a huge pizza.
  tr FS: Çocuğa kocaman bir pizza geldi.
  EN TP: a boy getting a burger
  tr TP: burger alan bir çocuk
  EN FP: a boy cooking a burger
  tr FP: burger pişiren bir çocuk
4306 | prison (noun): a place where persons are locked up for punishment | loc: cezaevi
  EN TS: They are leaving prison!
  tr TS: Cezaevinden çıkıyorlar!
  EN FS: They are entering prison!
  tr FS: Cezaevine giriyorlar!
  EN TP: leaving the prison
  tr TP: cezaevinden çıkmak
  EN FP: visiting a prison
  tr FP: cezaevini ziyaret etmek
4307 | banner (noun): a long strip of cloth or paper with a message | loc: pankart
  EN TS: Four banners are waving above.
  tr TS: Yukarıda dört pankart dalgalanıyor.
  EN FS: Two banners are waving above.
  tr FS: Yukarıda iki pankart dalgalanıyor.
  EN TP: banners above the stand
  tr TP: tribünün üstünde pankartlar
  EN FP: banners above the shop
  tr FP: dükkânın üstünde pankartlar
4308 | supporter (noun): a person who backs a team or politician | loc: taraftar
  EN TS: These supporters never stop singing.
  tr TS: Bu taraftarlar şarkı söylemeyi hiç bırakmıyor.
  EN FS: These supporters never stop dancing.
  tr FS: Bu taraftarlar dans etmeyi hiç bırakmıyor.
  EN TP: singing supporters
  tr TP: şarkı söyleyen taraftarlar
  EN FP: sleeping supporters
  tr FP: uyuyan taraftarlar
4309 | anthem (noun): a song of loyalty to a nation or school | loc: marş
  EN TS: The anthem is making her cry.
  tr TS: Marş onu ağlatıyor.
  EN FS: The goal is making her cry.
  tr FS: Gol onu ağlatıyor.
  EN TP: singing the anthem
  tr TP: marşı söylemek
  EN FP: writing the anthem
  tr FP: marşı yazmak
4310 | emotional (adjective): showing strong feelings openly | loc: duygusal
  EN TS: The emotional player is crying!
  tr TS: Duygusal oyuncu ağlıyor!
  EN FS: The emotional player is laughing!
  tr FS: Duygusal oyuncu gülüyor!
  EN TP: an emotional team song
  tr TP: duygusal bir takım şarkısı
  EN FP: an emotional wedding song
  tr FP: duygusal bir düğün şarkısı
4311 | young (adjective): in an early period of life | loc: genç
  EN TS: Even grandma plays with the young man.
  tr TS: Nine bile genç adamla oynuyor.
  EN FS: Even grandpa plays with the young man.
  tr FS: Dede bile genç adamla oynuyor.
  EN TP: a young basketball player
  tr TP: genç bir basketbolcu
  EN FP: a young tennis player
  tr FP: genç bir tenisçi
4312 | loud (adjective): producing sound of great volume | loc: yüksek sesli
  EN TS: He is loud, but nobody hears.
  tr TS: Yüksek sesle bağırıyor ama kimse duymuyor.
  EN FS: He is quiet, but nobody hears.
  tr FS: Sessizce konuşuyor ama kimse duymuyor.
  EN TP: a loud call
  tr TP: yüksek sesli bir çağrı
  EN FP: a loud party
  tr FP: yüksek sesli bir parti
4313 | pub (noun): a building with a bar where people drink | loc: birahane
  EN TS: The whole pub is singing!
  tr TS: Bütün birahane şarkı söylüyor!
  EN FS: The whole pub is sleeping!
  tr FS: Bütün birahane uyuyor!
  EN TP: karaoke in a pub
  tr TP: birahanede karaoke
  EN FP: a pub quiz night
  tr FP: birahanede bilgi yarışması gecesi
4314 | orange (noun): a round orange citrus fruit | loc: portakal
  EN TS: Four oranges are in the bowl.
  tr TS: Kasede dört portakal var.
  EN FS: Four apples are in the bowl.
  tr FS: Kasede dört elma var.
  EN TP: a bowl of oranges
  tr TP: bir kase portakal
  EN FP: a glass of orange juice
  tr FP: bir bardak portakal suyu
4315 | price (noun): the amount of money something is sold for | loc: fiyat
  EN TS: The price keeps going up!
  tr TS: Fiyat durmadan artıyor!
  EN FS: The price keeps going down!
  tr FS: Fiyat durmadan düşüyor!
  EN TP: the price of a flat
  tr TP: bir dairenin fiyatı
  EN FP: the price of a car
  tr FP: bir arabanın fiyatı
4316 | sorry (adjective): feeling regret over something you did | loc: pişman
  EN TS: He is sorry. Tulips will help.
  tr TS: Pişman. Laleler kurtarır.
  EN FS: He is sorry. Roses will help.
  tr FS: Pişman. Güller kurtarır.
  EN TP: sorry about the coffee
  tr TP: kahve yüzünden pişman
  EN FP: sorry about the cake
  tr FP: pasta yüzünden pişman
4317 | apologize (verb): to admit your faults and say sorry | loc: özür dilemek
  EN TS: He is apologizing with coffee.
  tr TS: Kahveyle özür diliyor.
  EN FS: He is apologizing with cake.
  tr FS: Pastayla özür diliyor.
  EN TP: apologizing for a spill
  tr TP: döktüğü için özür dilemek
  EN FP: apologizing for being late
  tr FP: geç kaldığı için özür dilemek
4318 | applause (noun): showing approval by clapping the hands | loc: alkış
  EN TS: His applause is growing.
  tr TS: Alkışı giderek artıyor.
  EN FS: His laughter is growing.
  tr FS: Kahkahası giderek artıyor.
  EN TP: applause for the performer
  tr TP: sanatçıya alkış
  EN FP: applause for the team
  tr FP: takıma alkış
4319 | blend (verb): to combine things into one | loc: karıştırmak
  EN TS: The stripes are blending in.
  tr TS: Çizgiler birbirine karıştırılıyor.
  EN FS: The stripes are growing wider.
  tr FS: Çizgiler giderek genişliyor.
  EN TP: blending cream into skin
  tr TP: kremi cilde karıştırmak
  EN FP: blending fruit in a mixer
  tr FP: meyveyi blenderda karıştırmak
4320 | plan (noun): a scale drawing of a building | loc: plan
  EN TS: He is drawing a plan.
  tr TS: Plan çiziyor.
  EN FS: He is drawing a face.
  tr FS: Yüz çiziyor.
  EN TP: drawing a house plan
  tr TP: ev planı çizmek
  EN FP: making a holiday plan
  tr FP: tatil planı yapmak
4321 | model (noun): a representation of something, often smaller | loc: maket
  EN TS: She is fixing a city model.
  tr TS: Bir şehir maketini onarıyor.
  EN FS: She is fixing a car model.
  tr FS: Bir araba maketini onarıyor.
  EN TP: a model of a city
  tr TP: bir şehir maketi
  EN FP: a model on a catwalk
  tr FP: podyumda bir manken
4322 | dance (noun): an artistic form of moving to music | loc: dans
  EN TS: What a beautiful dance!
  tr TS: Ne güzel bir dans!
  EN FS: What a beautiful car!
  tr FS: Ne güzel bir araba!
  EN TP: a tango dance
  tr TP: bir tango dansı
  EN FP: a dance class
  tr FP: bir dans dersi
4323 | lane (noun): a narrow way or road | loc: dar sokak
  EN TS: Nice dance moves in the lane!
  tr TS: Dar sokakta harika dans figürleri!
  EN FS: Nice bike tricks in the lane!
  tr FS: Dar sokakta harika bisiklet numaraları!
  EN TP: a narrow painted lane
  tr TP: boyalı dar bir sokak
  EN FP: a fast lane
  tr FP: hızlı şerit
4324 | vast (adjective): unusually great in size or extent | loc: devasa
  EN TS: Vast glacier, tiny human.
  tr TS: Devasa buzul, minicik insan.
  EN FS: Vast glacier, tiny penguin.
  tr FS: Devasa buzul, minicik penguen.
  EN TP: a vast wall of ice
  tr TP: devasa bir buz duvarı
  EN FP: a vast crowd of people
  tr FP: devasa bir kalabalık
4325 | cattle (noun): cows and bulls as a group of farm animals | loc: sığır
  EN TS: Fact: the cattle are grazing.
  tr TS: Bilgi: sığırlar otluyor.
  EN FS: Fact: the horses are grazing.
  tr FS: Bilgi: atlar otluyor.
  EN TP: cattle grazing on a plain
  tr TP: ovada otlayan sığırlar
  EN FP: cattle in a barn
  tr FP: ahırda sığırlar
4326 | wood (noun): the hard substance under the bark of trees | loc: odun
  EN TS: The wood is burning.
  tr TS: Odun yanıyor.
  EN FS: The coal is burning.
  tr FS: Kömür yanıyor.
  EN TP: burning wood
  tr TP: yanan odun
  EN FP: cutting wood
  tr FP: odun kesmek
4327 | barbecue (noun): cooking meat outdoors on a hot grill | loc: barbekü
  EN TS: Everyone loves his barbecue!
  tr TS: Herkes onun barbeküsüne bayılıyor!
  EN FS: Everyone loves his salad!
  tr FS: Herkes onun salatasına bayılıyor!
  EN TP: a sunset barbecue with friends
  tr TP: gün batımında arkadaşlarla barbekü
  EN FP: a barbecue in the rain
  tr FP: yağmurda barbekü
4328 | rug (noun): a thick heavy fabric floor covering | loc: halı
  EN TS: The rug has a fringe.
  tr TS: Halının püskülleri var.
  EN FS: The rug has a hole.
  tr FS: Halının bir deliği var.
  EN TP: a fringed rug
  tr TP: püsküllü bir halı
  EN FP: a rug on the wall
  tr FP: duvarda bir halı
4329 | furniture (noun): the furnishings that make a room ready to use | loc: mobilya
  EN TS: They are sitting on furniture.
  tr TS: Mobilyaların üstünde oturuyorlar.
  EN FS: They are sitting on the floor.
  tr FS: Yerde oturuyorlar.
  EN TP: sitting on soft furniture
  tr TP: yumuşak mobilyada oturmak
  EN FP: carrying the furniture
  tr FP: mobilyaları taşımak
4330 | march (verb): to march in a procession | loc: tören yürüyüşü yapmak
  EN TS: The soldiers are marching.
  tr TS: Askerler tören yürüyüşü yapıyor.
  EN FS: The soldiers are dancing.
  tr FS: Askerler dans ediyor.
  EN TP: soldiers marching in step
  tr TP: tören yürüyüşündeki askerler
  EN FP: soldiers marching at night
  tr FP: gece yürüyen askerler
4331 | march (noun): walking with regular steps in a procession | loc: yürüyüş
  EN TS: It is a very precise march.
  tr TS: Çok kusursuz bir yürüyüş.
  EN FS: It is a very messy march.
  tr FS: Çok dağınık bir yürüyüş.
  EN TP: a march down the street
  tr TP: caddede bir yürüyüş
  EN FP: a march in the forest
  tr FP: ormanda bir yürüyüş
4332 | arrest (verb): to take someone into custody | loc: tutuklamak
  EN TS: He is arresting a burglar with rubber chickens.
  tr TS: Hırsızı lastik tavuklarla tutukluyor.
  EN FS: He is arresting a burglar with gold watches.
  tr FS: Hırsızı altın saatlerle tutukluyor.
  EN TP: arresting a burglar
  tr TP: bir hırsızı tutuklamak
  EN FP: arresting a police officer
  tr FP: bir polisi tutuklamak
4333 | platform (noun): a raised flat surface | loc: platform
  EN TS: She stepped onto the platform.
  tr TS: Platforma adımını attı.
  EN FS: She stepped onto the bus.
  tr FS: Otobüse adımını attı.
  EN TP: a busy station platform
  tr TP: kalabalık bir istasyon platformu
  EN FP: a diving platform
  tr FP: bir atlama platformu
4334 | studio (noun): a workplace for practising or teaching an art | loc: atölye
  EN TS: She is painting in her studio.
  tr TS: Atölyesinde resim yapıyor.
  EN FS: She is dancing in her studio.
  tr FS: Atölyesinde dans ediyor.
  EN TP: a painter's busy studio
  tr TP: bir ressamın hareketli atölyesi
  EN FP: a recording studio
  tr FP: bir kayıt stüdyosu
4335 | ask (verb): to inquire about something | loc: sormak
  EN TS: The whole hall wants to ask!
  tr TS: Bütün salon soru sormak istiyor!
  EN FS: The whole hall wants to leave!
  tr FS: Bütün salon gitmek istiyor!
  EN TP: asking a question
  tr TP: soru sormak
  EN FP: asking for money
  tr FP: para istemek
4336 | instructions (noun): a manual explaining how to use a device | loc: kullanım kılavuzu
  EN TS: He's reading the instructions, she's building.
  tr TS: Adam kullanım kılavuzunu okuyor, kadın çoktan kuruyor.
  EN FS: He's reading the newspaper, she's building.
  tr FS: Adam gazete okuyor, kadın çoktan kuruyor.
  EN TP: reading the instructions
  tr TP: kullanım kılavuzunu okumak
  EN FP: ignoring the instructions
  tr FP: kullanım kılavuzunu umursamamak
4337 | phone (verb): to get in touch with someone by telephone | loc: telefon etmek
  EN TS: She is phoning and running!
  tr TS: Hem telefon ediyor hem koşuyor!
  EN FS: She is phoning and dancing!
  tr FS: Hem telefon ediyor hem dans ediyor!
  EN TP: phoning while running
  tr TP: koşarken telefon etmek
  EN FP: phoning while driving
  tr FP: araba sürerken telefon etmek
4338 | cash (noun): money in the form of bills or coins | loc: nakit
  EN TS: The ATM is spitting out cash.
  tr TS: ATM resmen nakit kusuyor.
  EN FS: The ATM is spitting out cards.
  tr FS: ATM resmen kart kusuyor.
  EN TP: cash flying out
  tr TP: uçuşan nakit
  EN FP: cash in a wallet
  tr FP: cüzdanda nakit
4339 | bank (noun): a financial institution that keeps and lends money | loc: banka
  EN TS: Her bank card works!
  tr TS: Banka kartı çalışıyor!
  EN FS: Her bank card is broken!
  tr FS: Banka kartı bozuk!
  EN TP: a row of bank machines
  tr TP: yan yana banka makineleri
  EN FP: a bank by the river
  tr FP: nehir kenarında bir banka
4340 | chips (noun): strips of potato fried in deep fat | loc: patates kızartması
  EN TS: The gulls want his chips!
  tr TS: Martılar onun patates kızartmasını istiyor!
  EN FS: The dogs want his chips!
  tr FS: Köpekler onun patates kızartmasını istiyor!
  EN TP: shielding his chips from gulls
  tr TP: patates kızartmasını martılardan korumak
  EN FP: sharing chips with friends
  tr FP: arkadaşlarla patates kızartması paylaşmak
4341 | flee (verb): to run away quickly | loc: kaçmak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is fleeing from the gulls!
  tr TS: Martılardan kaçıyor!
  EN FS: He is fleeing from the dogs!
  tr FS: Köpeklerden kaçıyor!
  EN TP: fleeing from the gulls
  tr TP: martılardan kaçmak
  EN FP: fleeing from a storm
  tr FP: fırtınadan kaçmak
4342 | haul (verb): to pull something slowly and heavily | loc: sürüklemek
  EN TS: She is hauling a heavy trunk.
  tr TS: Ağır bir sandığı sürüklüyor.
  EN FS: She is hauling a heavy chair.
  tr FS: Ağır bir sandalyeyi sürüklüyor.
  EN TP: hauling a heavy trunk
  tr TP: ağır bir sandığı sürüklemek
  EN FP: hauling a fishing net
  tr FP: balık ağını sürüklemek
4343 | laughter (noun): the sound of laughing | loc: kahkaha
  EN TS: Laughter everywhere!
  tr TS: Her yerde kahkaha!
  EN FS: Tears everywhere!
  tr FS: Her yerde gözyaşı!
  EN TP: laughter in a playroom
  tr TP: oyun odasında kahkaha
  EN FP: laughter in a cinema
  tr FP: sinemada kahkaha
4344 | affection (noun): a warm feeling of liking someone | loc: sevgi
  EN TS: Flour, pastries and affection.
  tr TS: Un, hamur işleri ve sevgi.
  EN FS: Flour, pizza and affection.
  tr FS: Un, pizza ve sevgi.
  EN TP: affection in the kitchen
  tr TP: mutfakta sevgi
  EN FP: affection for a pet
  tr FP: evcil hayvana sevgi
4345 | joy (noun): the emotion of great happiness | loc: sevinç
  EN TS: Gifts, cake, pure joy!
  tr TS: Hediyeler, pasta, saf sevinç!
  EN FS: Gifts, pizza, pure joy!
  tr FS: Hediyeler, pizza, saf sevinç!
  EN TP: joy at a birthday party
  tr TP: doğum günü partisinde sevinç
  EN FP: joy at a wedding party
  tr FP: düğünde sevinç
4346 | hop (verb): to jump lightly | loc: zıplamak
  EN TS: Yo, kangaroos are hopping by.
  tr TS: Kanka, kangurular zıplayarak geçiyor.
  EN FS: Yo, rabbits are hopping by.
  tr FS: Kanka, tavşanlar zıplayarak geçiyor.
  EN TP: kangaroos hopping past
  tr TP: zıplayarak geçen kangurular
  EN FP: hopping on one foot
  tr FP: tek ayak üstünde zıplamak
4347 | ferry (verb): to transport people from one place to another | loc: taşımak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: A boat is ferrying her across.
  tr TS: Bir tekne onu karşıya taşıyor.
  EN FS: A bus is ferrying her across.
  tr FS: Bir otobüs onu karşıya taşıyor.
  EN TP: to ferry people across
  tr TP: insanları karşıya taşımak
  EN FP: to ferry goods upriver
  tr FP: nehrin yukarısına yük taşımak
4348 | athletic (adjective): relating to athletes or sport | loc: atletik
  EN TS: She looks so athletic!
  tr TS: Bu kız çok atletik görünüyor!
  EN FS: He looks so athletic!
  tr FS: Bu adam çok atletik görünüyor!
  EN TP: an athletic surfer
  tr TP: atletik bir sörfçü
  EN FP: an athletic club meeting
  tr FP: atletizm kulübü toplantısı
4349 | guard (noun): a person who keeps watch over something | loc: bekçi
  EN TS: This guard can really surf.
  tr TS: Bu bekçi resmen sörf yapabiliyor.
  EN FS: This guard can really ski.
  tr FS: Bu bekçi resmen kayak yapabiliyor.
  EN TP: a guard on a surfboard
  tr TP: sörf tahtasında bir bekçi
  EN FP: a guard on a horse
  tr FP: at üstünde bir bekçi
4350 | bell (noun): a hollow metal device that rings when struck | loc: çan
  EN TS: Each cow has a big bell.
  tr TS: Her ineğin kocaman bir çanı var.
  EN FS: Each cow has a big horn.
  tr FS: Her ineğin kocaman bir boynuzu var.
  EN TP: a bell on a cow
  tr TP: inekte bir çan
  EN FP: a bell on a church
  tr FP: kilisede bir çan
4351 | marble (noun): a hard rock that takes a high polish | loc: mermer
  EN TS: She is leaning on the marble.
  tr TS: Mermere yaslanıyor.
  EN FS: She is leaning on the piano.
  tr FS: Piyanoya yaslanıyor.
  EN TP: a polished marble railing
  tr TP: cilalı mermer korkuluk
  EN FP: a marble garden statue
  tr FP: mermer bir bahçe heykeli
4352 | turn (noun): the act of changing direction | loc: dönüş
  EN TS: She is making a sharp turn.
  tr TS: Keskin bir dönüş yapıyor.
  EN FS: She is making a sharp jump.
  tr FS: Keskin bir atlayış yapıyor.
  EN TP: a sharp turn on skis
  tr TP: kayakla keskin bir dönüş
  EN FP: a wrong turn on skis
  tr FP: kayakla yanlış bir dönüş
4353 | dessert (noun): a sweet dish served at the end of a meal | loc: tatlı
  EN TS: Great dessert, chef.
  tr TS: Harika tatlı, şef.
  EN FS: Great salad, chef.
  tr FS: Harika salata, şef.
  EN TP: a chocolate cake dessert
  tr TP: çikolatalı pasta tatlısı
  EN FP: a dessert of fresh fruit
  tr FP: taze meyveden tatlı
4354 | kick (noun): a blow with the foot | loc: tekme
  EN TS: Her kick sent leaves flying.
  tr TS: Tekmesi yaprakları uçurdu.
  EN FS: Her kick sent acorns flying.
  tr FS: Tekmesi palamutları uçurdu.
  EN TP: a kick in the leaves
  tr TP: yapraklara bir tekme
  EN FP: a kick at a football
  tr FP: topa bir tekme
4355 | adorable (adjective): lovable in a sweet, childlike way | loc: sevimli
  EN TS: An adorable baby is kicking its feet.
  tr TS: Sevimli bir bebek ayaklarını tepiyor.
  EN FS: An adorable puppy is kicking its feet.
  tr FS: Sevimli bir köpek yavrusu ayaklarını tepiyor.
  EN TP: an adorable smiling baby
  tr TP: gülümseyen sevimli bir bebek
  EN FP: an adorable sleeping kitten
  tr FP: uyuyan sevimli bir kedi yavrusu
4356 | sore (adjective): painful, hurting | loc: ağrıyan
  EN TS: Sore back? Still a piggyback!
  tr TS: Ağrıyan bel mi? Yine de sırtta taşıma!
  EN FS: Sore neck? Still a piggyback!
  tr FS: Ağrıyan boyun mu? Yine de sırtta taşıma!
  EN TP: rubbing a sore back
  tr TP: ağrıyan sırtı ovmak
  EN FP: a sore throat in bed
  tr FP: yatakta ağrıyan boğaz
4357 | canvas (noun): a heavy woven fabric used for sails or tents | loc: kanvas
  EN TS: Her canvas rucksack could hold a sofa.
  tr TS: Kanvas sırt çantasına kanepe bile sığar.
  EN FS: Her leather rucksack could hold a sofa.
  tr FS: Deri sırt çantasına kanepe bile sığar.
  EN TP: a big canvas rucksack
  tr TP: büyük bir kanvas sırt çantası
  EN FP: a canvas for painting
  tr FP: resim için bir kanvas
4358 | heavy (adjective): of great physical weight | loc: ağır
  EN TS: That bag looks a bit heavy.
  tr TS: O çanta biraz ağır görünüyor.
  EN FS: That bike looks a bit heavy.
  tr FS: O bisiklet biraz ağır görünüyor.
  EN TP: a heavy rucksack
  tr TP: ağır bir sırt çantası
  EN FP: heavy rain
  tr FP: sağanak yağmur
4359 | can (noun): a sealed metal container for food or drink | loc: konserve kutusu
  EN TS: The cans are falling out.
  tr TS: Konserve kutuları düşüyor.
  EN FS: The eggs are falling out.
  tr FS: Yumurtalar düşüyor.
  EN TP: cans falling from a bag
  tr TP: poşetten düşen konserve kutuları
  EN FP: a can of paint
  tr FP: bir kutu boya
4360 | purse (noun): a container for carrying money and small items | loc: el çantası
  EN TS: She bought more than a purse.
  tr TS: Bir el çantasından fazlasını aldı.
  EN FS: She sold more than a purse.
  tr FS: Bir el çantasından fazlasını sattı.
  EN TP: showing off a new purse
  tr TP: yeni el çantasını göstermek
  EN FP: losing her purse
  tr FP: el çantasını kaybetmek
4361 | shop (verb): to do your shopping | loc: alışveriş yapmak
  EN TS: She is shopping like a pro.
  tr TS: Kız alışverişi resmen profesyonel gibi yapıyor.
  EN FS: He is shopping like a pro.
  tr FS: Adam alışverişi resmen profesyonel gibi yapıyor.
  EN TP: shopping with many bags
  tr TP: bir sürü poşetle alışveriş yapmak
  EN FP: shopping for food
  tr FP: yiyecek alışverişi yapmak
4362 | belt (noun): a loop of flexible material running between wheels | loc: taşıma bandı
  EN TS: A suitcase is on the belt.
  tr TS: Taşıma bandında bir valiz var.
  EN FS: A suitcase is on the bus.
  tr FS: Otobüste bir valiz var.
  EN TP: a moving luggage belt
  tr TP: hareket eden bir taşıma bandı
  EN FP: a leather belt
  tr FP: deri bir kemer
4363 | appear (verb): to come into sight | loc: görünmek
  EN TS: His backpack finally appeared!
  tr TS: Sırt çantası sonunda göründü!
  EN FS: His suitcase finally appeared!
  tr FS: Valizi sonunda göründü!
  EN TP: appearing on the belt
  tr TP: bantta görünmek
  EN FP: appearing on television
  tr FP: televizyonda görünmek
4364 | dough (noun): a flour mixture you can knead or roll | loc: hamur
  EN TS: Dough in, croissants out!
  tr TS: Hamur girdi, kruvasan çıktı!
  EN FS: Dough in, pizzas out!
  tr FS: Hamur girdi, pizza çıktı!
  EN TP: balls of raw dough
  tr TP: çiğ hamur topları
  EN FP: dough for a pizza base
  tr FP: pizza tabanı için hamur
4365 | fresh (adjective): recently made, produced or picked | loc: taze
  EN TS: So much fresh bread!
  tr TS: Ne kadar çok taze ekmek!
  EN FS: So much fresh fish!
  tr FS: Ne kadar çok taze balık!
  EN TP: fresh bread from the oven
  tr TP: fırından taze ekmek
  EN FP: fresh fish from the sea
  tr FP: denizden taze balık
4366 | job (noun): the main activity you do to earn money | loc: iş
  EN TS: He loves his job.
  tr TS: İşini seviyor.
  EN FS: He hates his job.
  tr FS: İşinden nefret ediyor.
  EN TP: a job in a bakery
  tr TP: fırında bir iş
  EN FP: a job in a bank
  tr FP: bankada bir iş
4367 | dry (verb): to remove the moisture and make dry | loc: kurutmak
  EN TS: Sheets are drying in the wind.
  tr TS: Çarşaflar rüzgârda kurutuluyor.
  EN FS: Sheets are drying on a boat.
  tr FS: Çarşaflar teknede kurutuluyor.
  EN TP: sheets drying in the wind
  tr TP: rüzgârda çarşaf kurutmak
  EN FP: dishes drying on a rack
  tr FP: bulaşıkları rafta kurutmak
4368 | light (verb): to make something lighter or brighter | loc: aydınlatmak
  EN TS: She is lighting the bulbs.
  tr TS: Ampullerle ortamı aydınlatıyor.
  EN FS: She is lighting the candles.
  tr FS: Mumlarla ortamı aydınlatıyor.
  EN TP: lighting a string of bulbs
  tr TP: bir dizi ampulle aydınlatmak
  EN FP: lighting a candle
  tr FP: mum yakmak
4369 | tape (noun): a long thin strip of cloth or paper for fastening | loc: bant
  EN TS: Too much tape? Maybe a little.
  tr TS: Fazla mı bant? Belki biraz.
  EN FS: Too much glue? Maybe a little.
  tr FS: Fazla mı yapıştırıcı? Belki biraz.
  EN TP: wrapped in white tape
  tr TP: beyaz banta sarılmış
  EN FP: tape on a cardboard box
  tr FP: karton kutuda bant
4370 | safe (noun): a strongbox where valuables are kept | loc: kasa
  EN TS: The big safe is open.
  tr TS: Büyük kasa açık.
  EN FS: The big safe is closed.
  tr FS: Büyük kasa kapalı.
  EN TP: an open bank safe
  tr TP: açık bir banka kasası
  EN FP: a safe place to hide
  tr FP: saklanacak güvenli bir yer
4371 | lobby (noun): a large entrance or reception area | loc: lobi
  EN TS: The bank lobby is huge.
  tr TS: Banka lobisi devasa.
  EN FS: The bank lobby is tiny.
  tr FS: Banka lobisi minicik.
  EN TP: a marble bank lobby
  tr TP: mermer bir banka lobisi
  EN FP: a busy hotel lobby
  tr FP: kalabalık bir otel lobisi
4373 | gather (verb): to get together, assemble | loc: toplanmak
  EN TS: The squad gathered on a roof.
  tr TS: Tayfa bir çatıda toplandı.
  EN FS: The squad gathered on a boat.
  tr FS: Tayfa bir teknede toplandı.
  EN TP: friends gathering on a roof
  tr TP: çatıda toplanan arkadaşlar
  EN FP: gathering wood for a fire
  tr FP: ateş için odun toplamak
4374 | electric (adjective): using or producing electricity | loc: elektrikli
  EN TS: The barber uses electric clippers.
  tr TS: Berber elektrikli tıraş makinesi kullanıyor.
  EN FS: The barber uses an electric fan.
  tr FS: Berber elektrikli vantilatör kullanıyor.
  EN TP: an electric hair clipper
  tr TP: elektrikli saç kesme makinesi
  EN FP: an electric guitar
  tr FP: elektrikli gitar
4375 | rough (adjective): having an irregular, uneven surface | loc: pürüzlü
  EN TS: The bark is rough and cracked.
  tr TS: Ağaç kabuğu pürüzlü ve çatlak.
  EN FS: The bark is smooth and clean.
  tr FS: Ağaç kabuğu pürüzsüz ve temiz.
  EN TP: rough tree bark
  tr TP: pürüzlü ağaç kabuğu
  EN FP: rough sea waves
  tr FP: hırçın deniz dalgaları
4376 | noise (noun): sound of any kind, often unpleasant | loc: gürültü
  EN TS: The smallest dog is making the biggest noise!
  tr TS: En küçük köpek en büyük gürültüyü yapıyor!
  EN FS: The smallest cat is making the biggest noise!
  tr FS: En küçük kedi en büyük gürültüyü yapıyor!
  EN TP: a lot of noise
  tr TP: bir sürü gürültü
  EN FP: a lot of music
  tr FP: bir sürü müzik
4377 | basement (noun): a room below ground level in a building | loc: bodrum
  EN TS: The basement has a cinema!
  tr TS: Bodrumda sinema var!
  EN FS: The basement has a pool!
  tr FS: Bodrumda havuz var!
  EN TP: a basement home cinema
  tr TP: bodrumda ev sineması
  EN FP: a basement full of water
  tr FP: su basmış bir bodrum
4378 | shower (noun): a fixture that sprays water over you | loc: duş
  EN TS: Two showers in one bathroom? Wow!
  tr TS: Bir banyoda iki duş mu? Vay!
  EN FS: Two toilets in one bathroom? Wow!
  tr FS: Bir banyoda iki tuvalet mi? Vay!
  EN TP: a shower on the wall
  tr TP: duvarda bir duş
  EN FP: a shower in the garden
  tr FP: bahçede bir duş
4379 | tub (noun): a large open container you fill with water to wash | loc: küvet
  EN TS: The tub is foaming over!
  tr TS: Küvet köpükten taşıyor!
  EN FS: The sink is foaming over!
  tr FS: Lavabo köpükten taşıyor!
  EN TP: scrubbing the tub
  tr TP: küveti ovmak
  EN FP: a tub of ice cream
  tr FP: bir kutu dondurma
4380 | fill (verb): to make something full | loc: doldurmak
  EN TS: She is filling the bath.
  tr TS: Küveti dolduruyor.
  EN FS: She is filling the sink.
  tr FS: Lavaboyu dolduruyor.
  EN TP: filling a bath with foam
  tr TP: küveti köpükle doldurmak
  EN FP: filling a glass with water
  tr FP: bardağı suyla doldurmak
4381 | warm (adjective): having a comfortable degree of heat | loc: ılık
  EN TS: A warm day at the beach.
  tr TS: Plajda ılık bir gün.
  EN FS: A cold day at the beach.
  tr FS: Plajda soğuk bir gün.
  EN TP: a warm sunny beach
  tr TP: ılık, güneşli bir plaj
  EN FP: a warm winter coat
  tr FP: sıcacık bir kışlık mont
4382 | salmon (noun): a large food fish of northern waters | loc: somon
  EN TS: The bear is grabbing a salmon.
  tr TS: Ayı bir somon yakalıyor.
  EN FS: The bear is grabbing a bird.
  tr FS: Ayı bir kuş yakalıyor.
  EN TP: a leaping salmon
  tr TP: sıçrayan bir somon
  EN FP: a salmon on a plate
  tr FP: tabakta bir somon
4383 | thick (adjective): not thin, wide from one surface to the other | loc: kalın
  EN TS: What a thick beard!
  tr TS: Ne kalın bir sakal!
  EN FS: What a thin beard!
  tr FS: Ne ince bir sakal!
  EN TP: a thick black beard
  tr TP: kalın siyah bir sakal
  EN FP: a thick winter coat
  tr FP: kalın bir kışlık mont
4384 | bounce (verb): to spring back after hitting something | loc: sekmek | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She bounced off her bed!
  tr TS: Yatağından sekti!
  EN FS: She bounced off the sofa!
  tr FS: Kanepeden sekti!
  EN TP: bouncing on the bed
  tr TP: yataktan sekmek
  EN FP: bouncing a ball
  tr FP: top sektirmek
4385 | cost (verb): to be priced at a certain amount | loc: tutmak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The big bed costs 20,000 euros. "Cheap."
  tr TS: Büyük yatak 20.000 euro tutuyor. "Ucuz."
  EN FS: The big bed costs 200 euros. "Cheap."
  tr FS: Büyük yatak 200 euro tutuyor. "Ucuz."
  EN TP: costing 20,000 euros
  tr TP: 20.000 euro tutmak
  EN FP: costing 50 cents
  tr FP: 50 sent tutmak
4386 | poster (noun): a sign put up in a public place as an advert | loc: afiş
  EN TS: Posters cover his whole room.
  tr TS: Afişler bütün odasını kaplıyor.
  EN FS: Maps cover his whole room.
  tr FS: Haritalar bütün odasını kaplıyor.
  EN TP: walls covered in posters
  tr TP: afişlerle kaplı duvarlar
  EN FP: posters on the fridge
  tr FP: buzdolabında afişler
4387 | compare (verb): to examine how things are similar or different | loc: karşılaştırmak
  EN TS: We compare three bedrooms.
  tr TS: Üç yatak odasını karşılaştırıyoruz.
  EN FS: We compare three kitchens.
  tr FS: Üç mutfağı karşılaştırıyoruz.
  EN TP: comparing three bedrooms
  tr TP: üç yatak odasını karşılaştırmak
  EN FP: comparing three kitchens
  tr FP: üç mutfağı karşılaştırmak
4388 | daisy (noun): a plant with flower heads of white ray petals | loc: papatya
  EN TS: A bee is pollinating daisies.
  tr TS: Bir arı papatyaları tozluyor.
  EN FS: A bird is pollinating daisies.
  tr FS: Bir kuş papatyaları tozluyor.
  EN TP: a bee over the daisies
  tr TP: papatyaların üstünde bir arı
  EN FP: a daisy chain necklace
  tr FP: papatyadan bir kolye
4389 | start (verb): to take the first step in doing something | loc: başlamak
  EN TS: He missed the start. Oops.
  tr TS: Yarış başladı, o kaçırdı. Hay aksi.
  EN FS: He missed the bus. Oops.
  tr FS: Otobüs kalktı, o kaçırdı. Hay aksi.
  EN TP: missing the start
  tr TP: başlangıcı kaçırmak
  EN FP: starting a car
  tr FP: arabayı çalıştırmak
4390 | excitement (noun): the feeling of lively, cheerful joy | loc: heyecan
  EN TS: The excitement is real!
  tr TS: Heyecan tavan!
  EN FS: The boredom is real!
  tr FS: Sıkıntı tavan!
  EN TP: excitement before a concert
  tr TP: konser öncesi heyecan
  EN FP: excitement before an exam
  tr FP: sınav öncesi heyecan
4391 | alone (adverb): without any others with you | loc: yalnız
  EN TS: Alone with a whole pizza? Yes!
  tr TS: Koca bir pizzayla yalnız mı? Evet!
  EN FS: Alone with a whole cake? Yes!
  tr FS: Koca bir pastayla yalnız mı? Evet!
  EN TP: home alone with pizza
  tr TP: evde yalnız, pizzayla
  EN FP: alone in a restaurant
  tr FP: restoranda yalnız
4392 | fall (noun): a sudden drop from standing up | loc: düşüş
  EN TS: What a fall in the park!
  tr TS: Parkta ne düşüş ama!
  EN FS: What a fall in the kitchen!
  tr FS: Mutfakta ne düşüş ama!
  EN TP: a fall over a bench
  tr TP: bankın üstünden düşüş
  EN FP: a fall from a ladder
  tr FP: merdivenden düşüş
4393 | chat (verb): to talk in a friendly, relaxed way | loc: sohbet etmek
  EN TS: The old guys are chatting.
  tr TS: Amcalar sohbet ediyor.
  EN FS: The old guys are fighting.
  tr FS: Amcalar kavga ediyor.
  EN TP: chatting on a bench
  tr TP: bankta sohbet etmek
  EN FP: chatting on the phone
  tr FP: telefonda sohbet etmek
4394 | bend (verb): to form a curve | loc: bükmek | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is bending everything!
  tr TS: Her şeyi büküyor!
  EN FS: She is breaking everything!
  tr FS: Her şeyi kırıyor!
  EN TP: bending a tree branch
  tr TP: ağaç dalını bükmek
  EN FP: bending a spoon
  tr FP: kaşık bükmek
4395 | opponent (noun): a contestant you are matched against | loc: rakip
  EN TS: She is attacking her opponent.
  tr TS: Rakibine saldırıyor.
  EN FS: She is hugging her opponent.
  tr FS: Rakibine sarılıyor.
  EN TP: a sneaky opponent
  tr TP: sinsi bir rakip
  EN FP: an opponent in the ring
  tr FP: ringde bir rakip
4396 | shock (verb): to surprise someone greatly | loc: şok etmek
  EN TS: Her move totally shocked him!
  tr TS: Kızın hamlesi onu resmen şok etti!
  EN FS: Her move totally bored him!
  tr FS: Kızın hamlesi onu resmen sıktı!
  EN TP: shocked by her move
  tr TP: hamlesiyle şok olmuş
  EN FP: shocked by the price
  tr FP: fiyatla şok olmuş
4397 | bike (verb): to ride a bicycle | loc: bisiklete binmek
  EN TS: He is biking in Amsterdam.
  tr TS: Amsterdam'da bisiklete biniyor.
  EN FS: He is biking in the forest.
  tr FS: Ormanda bisiklete biniyor.
  EN TP: to bike along a canal
  tr TP: kanal boyunca bisiklete binmek
  EN FP: to bike along a beach
  tr FP: sahil boyunca bisiklete binmek
4398 | advertisement (noun): a public promotion of a product or service | loc: reklam
  EN TS: Advertisements are everywhere!
  tr TS: Her yer reklam!
  EN FS: Trees are everywhere!
  tr FS: Her yer ağaç!
  EN TP: huge lit advertisements
  tr TP: ışıklı dev reklamlar
  EN FP: advertisements in a paper
  tr FP: gazetede reklamlar
4399 | dream (verb): to have a daydream or fantasy | loc: hayal kurmak
  EN TS: She is dreaming of a burger.
  tr TS: Bir burgerin hayalini kuruyor.
  EN FS: She is dreaming of a pizza.
  tr FS: Bir pizzanın hayalini kuruyor.
  EN TP: dreaming of a big house
  tr TP: büyük bir evin hayalini kurmak
  EN FP: dreaming at night in bed
  tr FP: gece yatakta rüya görmek
4400 | spot (verb): to catch sight of something | loc: fark etmek
  EN TS: She spotted birds at sea.
  tr TS: Denizde kuşları fark etti.
  EN FS: She spotted ships at sea.
  tr FS: Denizde gemileri fark etti.
  EN TP: to spot birds far away
  tr TP: uzaktaki kuşları fark etmek
  EN FP: to spot a mistake
  tr FP: bir hatayı fark etmek
4401 | far (adjective): at a great distance | loc: uzak
  EN TS: She is looking at the far shore.
  tr TS: Uzak kıyıya bakıyor.
  EN FS: She is looking at the far city.
  tr FS: Uzak şehre bakıyor.
  EN TP: the far lake shore
  tr TP: gölün uzak kıyısı
  EN FP: a far country
  tr FP: uzak bir ülke
4402 | appetite (noun): a feeling of craving food or something else | loc: iştah
  EN TS: Apple, burger, melon: big appetite!
  tr TS: Elma, burger, kavun: iştah tavan!
  EN FS: Apple, pizza, melon: big appetite!
  tr FS: Elma, pizza, kavun: iştah tavan!
  EN TP: a huge picnic appetite
  tr TP: piknikte kocaman bir iştah
  EN FP: no appetite at all
  tr FP: hiç iştah yok
4403 | layer (noun): a single thickness of some material | loc: katman
  EN TS: Just one more layer.
  tr TS: Sadece bir katman daha.
  EN FS: Just one more pillow.
  tr FS: Sadece bir yastık daha.
  EN TP: layer after layer of blankets
  tr TP: katman katman battaniye
  EN FP: a layer of fresh snow
  tr FP: taze bir kar katmanı
4404 | injury (noun): physical damage to the body from an accident | loc: yaralanma
  EN TS: He has a finger injury.
  tr TS: Parmak yaralanması var.
  EN FS: He has a knee injury.
  tr FS: Diz yaralanması var.
  EN TP: a finger injury
  tr TP: parmak yaralanması
  EN FP: a sports injury
  tr FP: spor yaralanması
4405 | help (noun): the activity of doing something for someone's need | loc: yardım
  EN TS: His friend is a big help.
  tr TS: Arkadaşının yardımı çok büyük.
  EN FS: His dog is a big help.
  tr FS: Köpeğinin yardımı çok büyük.
  EN TP: help from a friend
  tr TP: bir arkadaştan yardım
  EN FP: help with homework
  tr FP: ödevde yardım
4406 | smooth (verb): to make something smooth, as if by rubbing | loc: düzleştirmek
  EN TS: The artist is smoothing lines.
  tr TS: Sanatçı çizgileri düzleştiriyor.
  EN FS: The artist is drawing lines.
  tr FS: Sanatçı çizgileri çiziyor.
  EN TP: smoothing harsh lines
  tr TP: sert çizgileri düzleştirmek
  EN FP: smoothing a bed sheet
  tr FP: yatak çarşafını düzleştirmek
4407 | healthy (adjective): having good health in body or mind | loc: sağlıklı
  EN TS: Spinach keeps him healthy.
  tr TS: Ispanak onu sağlıklı tutuyor.
  EN FS: Chocolate keeps him healthy.
  tr FS: Çikolata onu sağlıklı tutuyor.
  EN TP: a healthy young man
  tr TP: sağlıklı genç bir adam
  EN FP: a healthy bank account
  tr FP: sağlıklı bir banka hesabı
4408 | taste (noun): the sensation you get from food on your tongue | loc: tat | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Smoothie taste: perfect!
  tr TS: Smoothie tadı: mükemmel!
  EN FS: Coffee taste: perfect!
  tr FS: Kahve tadı: mükemmel!
  EN TP: the taste of a smoothie
  tr TP: smoothie'nin tadı
  EN FP: a good taste in music
  tr FP: iyi bir müzik zevki
4409 | blind (adjective): unable to see | loc: kör
  EN TS: The whole party is blind!
  tr TS: Partideki herkes kör!
  EN FS: The whole party is asleep!
  tr FS: Partideki herkes uykuda!
  EN TP: blind for a party game
  tr TP: parti oyununda kör
  EN FP: a blind date
  tr FP: kör randevu
4410 | contest (noun): an event where a winner is chosen from contestants | loc: yarışma
  EN TS: Staring contest! Don't blink!
  tr TS: Bakışma yarışması! Sakın göz kırpma!
  EN FS: Eating contest! Don't blink!
  tr FS: Yemek yeme yarışması! Sakın göz kırpma!
  EN TP: a staring contest
  tr TP: bakışma yarışması
  EN FP: a singing contest
  tr FP: şarkı yarışması
4411 | treatment (noun): medical care given to help someone get better | loc: tedavi
  EN TS: The treatment is a plaster.
  tr TS: Tedavi bir yara bandı.
  EN FS: The treatment is an injection.
  tr FS: Tedavi bir iğne.
  EN TP: treatment for a blister
  tr TP: su kabarcığı tedavisi
  EN FP: treatment for a headache
  tr FP: baş ağrısı tedavisi
4412 | block (verb): to make a way unsuitable for passage | loc: engellemek
  EN TS: Sheep are blocking the road!
  tr TS: Koyunlar yolu engelliyor!
  EN FS: Cows are blocking the road!
  tr FS: İnekler yolu engelliyor!
  EN TP: blocking a mountain road
  tr TP: dağ yolunu engellemek
  EN FP: blocking a phone number
  tr FP: bir numarayı engellemek
4413 | smell (noun): the sensation you get from odors in the nose | loc: koku
  EN TS: She loves the smell.
  tr TS: Kokuya bayılıyor.
  EN FS: She hates the smell.
  tr FS: Kokudan nefret ediyor.
  EN TP: the smell of blossoms
  tr TP: çiçeklerin kokusu
  EN FP: the smell of coffee
  tr FP: kahve kokusu
4414 | struggle (noun): an energetic attempt to achieve something | loc: mücadele
  EN TS: Going uphill is a real struggle.
  tr TS: Yokuş çıkmak gerçek bir mücadele.
  EN FS: Going downhill is a real struggle.
  tr FS: Yokuş inmek gerçek bir mücadele.
  EN TP: a struggle against the wind
  tr TP: rüzgâra karşı mücadele
  EN FP: a struggle with homework
  tr FP: ödevle mücadele
4415 | compliment (noun): a remark expressing praise or admiration | loc: iltifat
  EN TS: Stop it! Too many compliments!
  tr TS: Yeter! Çok fazla iltifat!
  EN FS: Stop it! Too many questions!
  tr FS: Yeter! Çok fazla soru!
  EN TP: blushing at a compliment
  tr TP: bir iltifatla kızarmak
  EN FP: a compliment to the chef
  tr FP: şefe bir iltifat
4416 | ticket (noun): a document that lets you ride or enter somewhere | loc: bilet
  EN TS: Green light, ticket OK!
  tr TS: Yeşil ışık, bilet tamam!
  EN FS: Green light, passport OK!
  tr FS: Yeşil ışık, pasaport tamam!
  EN TP: scanning a ticket
  tr TP: bilet okutmak
  EN FP: buying a train ticket
  tr FP: tren bileti almak
4417 | travel (noun): the act of going from one place to another | loc: seyahat
  EN TS: Travel by tram, boat, plane.
  tr TS: Tramvayla, tekneyle, uçakla seyahat.
  EN FS: Travel by bus, boat, plane.
  tr FS: Otobüsle, tekneyle, uçakla seyahat.
  EN TP: travel by boat
  tr TP: tekneyle seyahat
  EN FP: travel by car
  tr FP: arabayla seyahat
4418 | burst (verb): to come open suddenly from pressure inside | loc: patlamak
  EN TS: Steam burst into her face.
  tr TS: Buhar birden yüzüne patladı.
  EN FS: Water burst into her face.
  tr FS: Su birden yüzüne patladı.
  EN TP: steam bursting from a pot
  tr TP: tencereden patlayan buhar
  EN FP: a burst water pipe
  tr FP: patlamış bir su borusu
4419 | row (verb): to move a boat with oars | loc: kürek çekmek
  EN TS: She is rowing with her puppy.
  tr TS: Köpek yavrusuyla kürek çekiyor.
  EN FS: She is rowing with her kitten.
  tr FS: Kedi yavrusuyla kürek çekiyor.
  EN TP: rowing on a calm pond
  tr TP: sakin bir gölette kürek çekmek
  EN FP: rowing on a wild sea
  tr FP: dalgalı denizde kürek çekmek
4420 | illustration (noun): artwork that helps make something clear | loc: illüstrasyon | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The illustration shows a bone.
  tr TS: İllüstrasyon bir kemik gösteriyor.
  EN FS: The illustration shows a hand.
  tr FS: İllüstrasyon bir el gösteriyor.
  EN TP: an illustration of a bone
  tr TP: bir kemik illüstrasyonu
  EN FP: an illustration of a hand
  tr FP: bir el illüstrasyonu
4421 | bone (noun): the rigid tissue that makes up the skeleton | loc: kemik
  EN TS: She is holding a small bone.
  tr TS: Küçük bir kemik tutuyor.
  EN FS: She is holding a small stone.
  tr FS: Küçük bir taş tutuyor.
  EN TP: a long thigh bone
  tr TP: uzun bir uyluk kemiği
  EN FP: a dog's bone
  tr FP: bir köpeğin kemiği
4423 | barrier (noun): a structure that blocks free movement | loc: bariyer
  EN TS: The barrier is up. Run!
  tr TS: Bariyer kalktı. Koş!
  EN FS: The barrier is down. Run!
  tr FS: Bariyer indi. Koş!
  EN TP: a raised barrier
  tr TP: kalkmış bir bariyer
  EN FP: a language barrier
  tr FP: dil bariyeri
4424 | border (noun): the line where one country meets another | loc: sınır
  EN TS: The border is just a stripe.
  tr TS: Sınır sadece bir şerit.
  EN FS: The border is just a fence.
  tr FS: Sınır sadece bir çit.
  EN TP: crossing the border on foot
  tr TP: sınırı yürüyerek geçmek
  EN FP: a border around a picture
  tr FP: bir resmin kenar süsü
4425 | order (verb): to direct somebody to do something with authority | loc: emretmek | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The robot is ordering them around.
  tr TS: Robot onlara durmadan emrediyor.
  EN FS: The robot is ordering a big pizza.
  tr FS: Robot büyük bir pizza sipariş ediyor.
  EN TP: to order the team around
  tr TP: takıma emretmek
  EN FP: to order a coffee
  tr FP: kahve sipariş etmek
4426 | meeting (noun): a formally arranged gathering | loc: toplantı
  EN TS: The meeting went well.
  tr TS: Toplantı iyi geçti.
  EN FS: The meeting went badly.
  tr FS: Toplantı kötü geçti.
  EN TP: a meeting in the office
  tr TP: ofiste bir toplantı
  EN FP: a meeting in the park
  tr FP: parkta bir toplantı
4427 | ceremony (noun): a formal event on a special occasion | loc: tören
  EN TS: They are bowing at a ceremony.
  tr TS: Bir törende eğilerek selam veriyorlar.
  EN FS: They are eating at a ceremony.
  tr FS: Bir törende yemek yiyorlar.
  EN TP: a formal bowing ceremony
  tr TP: resmî bir selamlaşma töreni
  EN FP: a wedding ceremony
  tr FP: bir düğün töreni
4429 | restaurant (noun): a building where people go to eat | loc: restoran
  EN TS: Ramen at a noodle restaurant!
  tr TS: Erişte restoranında ramen!
  EN FS: Ramen at a burger restaurant!
  tr FS: Burger restoranında ramen!
  EN TP: a noodle restaurant
  tr TP: bir erişte restoranı
  EN FP: a restaurant kitchen
  tr FP: bir restoran mutfağı
4430 | kid (noun): a young person | loc: çocuk
  EN TS: The kid is so happy!
  tr TS: Çocuk çok mutlu!
  EN FS: The kid is so sad!
  tr FS: Çocuk çok üzgün!
  EN TP: a kid running fast
  tr TP: hızla koşan bir çocuk
  EN FP: a kid sitting still
  tr FP: kıpırdamadan oturan bir çocuk
4431 | score (verb): to gain points in a game | loc: skor yapmak
  EN TS: He scored, the dog wants a turn.
  tr TS: Skor yaptı, köpek de sıra istiyor.
  EN FS: He scored, the cat wants a turn.
  tr FS: Skor yaptı, kedi de sıra istiyor.
  EN TP: scoring a goal
  tr TP: gol atmak
  EN FP: scoring a basket
  tr FP: basket atmak
4432 | ignore (verb): to refuse to notice or acknowledge | loc: görmezden gelmek
  EN TS: Everyone is ignoring him.
  tr TS: Herkes onu görmezden geliyor.
  EN FS: Everyone is hugging him.
  tr FS: Herkes ona sarılıyor.
  EN TP: ignoring the salesman
  tr TP: satıcıyı görmezden gelmek
  EN FP: ignoring a phone call
  tr FP: bir aramayı görmezden gelmek
4433 | bunch (noun): a grouping of similar things | loc: demet
  EN TS: She will love this bunch.
  tr TS: Bu demete bayılacak.
  EN FS: She will love this cake.
  tr FS: Bu pastaya bayılacak.
  EN TP: a bunch of roses
  tr TP: bir demet gül
  EN FP: a bunch of keys
  tr FP: bir deste anahtar
4434 | fair (noun): a traveling show with rides and games | loc: lunapark
  EN TS: The fair is fun for two.
  tr TS: Lunapark iki kişi için çok eğlenceli.
  EN FS: The zoo is fun for two.
  tr FS: Hayvanat bahçesi iki kişi için çok eğlenceli.
  EN TP: a date at the fair
  tr TP: lunaparkta bir buluşma
  EN FP: a fair price
  tr FP: makul bir fiyat
4435 | exhibition (noun): a collection of things for public display | loc: sergi
  EN TS: Whoa, a brain exhibition!
  tr TS: Vay, beyin sergisi!
  EN FS: Whoa, a car exhibition!
  tr FS: Vay, araba sergisi!
  EN TP: a brain exhibition
  tr TP: bir beyin sergisi
  EN FP: an art exhibition
  tr FP: bir sanat sergisi
4436 | cheer (noun): a shout of approval | loc: tezahürat
  EN TS: A kick like Ronaldo gets a big cheer!
  tr TS: Ronaldo gibi bir vuruşa büyük tezahürat!
  EN FS: A header like Ronaldo gets a big cheer!
  tr FS: Ronaldo gibi bir kafa vuruşuna büyük tezahürat!
  EN TP: a cheer for the kick
  tr TP: vuruşa tezahürat
  EN FP: a cheer for the singer
  tr FP: şarkıcıya tezahürat
4438 | parade (noun): a ceremonial procession of people marching | loc: geçit töreni
  EN TS: She is leading the parade!
  tr TS: Geçit töreninin başında o var!
  EN FS: She is leading the marathon!
  tr FS: Maratonun başında o var!
  EN TP: a carnival parade
  tr TP: bir karnaval geçit töreni
  EN FP: a military parade
  tr FP: askerî geçit töreni
4439 | festival (noun): a day or period set aside for celebration | loc: festival
  EN TS: The festival is loud!
  tr TS: Festival çok gürültülü!
  EN FS: The festival is quiet!
  tr FS: Festival çok sessiz!
  EN TP: a street festival
  tr TP: bir sokak festivali
  EN FP: a film festival
  tr FP: bir film festivali
4440 | strike (verb): to deliver a sharp blow with the hand or fist | loc: vurmak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is striking concrete!
  tr TS: Betona vuruyor!
  EN FS: She is striking glass!
  tr FS: Cama vuruyor!
  EN TP: striking a stack of slabs
  tr TP: üst üste dizili plakalara vurmak
  EN FP: striking a match
  tr FP: kibrit çakmak
4441 | breath (noun): the process of taking in and letting out air | loc: nefes
  EN TS: Wow, her breath makes clouds.
  tr TS: Vay, nefesi bulut yapıyor.
  EN FS: Wow, her breath makes bubbles.
  tr FS: Vay, nefesi baloncuk yapıyor.
  EN TP: a cloud of warm breath
  tr TP: sıcak bir nefes bulutu
  EN FP: a breath of fresh air
  tr FP: bir nefes temiz hava
4442 | shoe (noun): footwear shaped to fit the foot | loc: ayakkabı
  EN TS: Her shoes are white.
  tr TS: Ayakkabıları beyaz.
  EN FS: Her shoes are red.
  tr FS: Ayakkabıları kırmızı.
  EN TP: plain white shoes
  tr TP: sade beyaz ayakkabılar
  EN FP: white running shoes
  tr FP: beyaz koşu ayakkabıları
4443 | wedding (noun): the event at which a marriage ceremony happens | loc: düğün
  EN TS: The wedding is starting and everyone is turning around.
  tr TS: Düğün başlıyor ve herkes arkasını dönüyor.
  EN FS: The wedding is ending and everyone is turning around.
  tr FS: Düğün bitiyor ve herkes arkasını dönüyor.
  EN TP: walking down a wedding aisle
  tr TP: düğünde koridordan yürümek
  EN FP: dancing at a wedding party
  tr FP: düğünde dans etmek
4445 | bridge (noun): a structure that lets people cross a river or road | loc: köprü
  EN TS: Wow, this bridge is huge!
  tr TS: Vay, bu köprü devasa!
  EN FS: Wow, this boat is huge!
  tr FS: Vay, bu tekne devasa!
  EN TP: a red suspension bridge
  tr TP: kırmızı bir asma köprü
  EN FP: a bridge over a road
  tr FP: yolun üstünde bir köprü
4446 | glass (noun): a hard transparent solid that breaks easily | loc: cam
  EN TS: The pub has frosted glass.
  tr TS: Birahanede buzlu cam var.
  EN FS: The pub has broken glass.
  tr FS: Birahanede kırık cam var.
  EN TP: panels of frosted glass
  tr TP: buzlu cam paneller
  EN FP: a glass of red wine
  tr FP: bir kadeh kırmızı şarap
4447 | wet (adjective): covered or soaked with water | loc: ıslak
  EN TS: Just a little wet today.
  tr TS: Bugün sadece biraz ıslak.
  EN FS: Just a little snowy today.
  tr FS: Bugün sadece biraz karlı.
  EN TP: a wet bus stop
  tr TP: ıslak bir otobüs durağı
  EN FP: a wet dog
  tr FP: ıslak bir köpek
4448 | handle (noun): the part of an object you hold to use or move it | loc: sap
  EN TS: She is gripping the handle.
  tr TS: Sapı sıkıca tutuyor.
  EN FS: She is gripping the ladder.
  tr FS: Merdiveni sıkıca tutuyor.
  EN TP: a long blue handle
  tr TP: uzun mavi bir sap
  EN FP: a door handle
  tr FP: kapı kolu
4450 | patch (noun): a small part that looks different from the rest | loc: yama
  EN TS: His dungarees have patches.
  tr TS: Tulumunda yamalar var.
  EN FS: His boots have patches.
  tr FS: Botlarında yamalar var.
  EN TP: patches on the dungarees
  tr TP: tulumdaki yamalar
  EN FP: a patch of grass
  tr FP: bir parça çimen
4451 | teenager (noun): a juvenile, between puberty and maturity | loc: ergen
  EN TS: Two teenagers are gaming, so intense.
  tr TS: İki ergen oyun oynuyor, ortam çok gergin.
  EN FS: Two teenagers are dancing, so intense.
  tr FS: İki ergen dans ediyor, ortam çok gergin.
  EN TP: teenagers playing a game
  tr TP: oyun oynayan ergenler
  EN FP: teenagers playing football
  tr FP: futbol oynayan ergenler
4452 | hurt (verb): to be the source of pain | loc: acımak
  EN TS: That shin must really hurt!
  tr TS: O kaval kemiği çok acımıştır!
  EN FS: That arm must really hurt!
  tr FS: O kol çok acımıştır!
  EN TP: a shin that hurts
  tr TP: acıyan bir kaval kemiği
  EN FP: an arm that hurts
  tr FP: acıyan bir kol
4454 | tip (verb): to cause something to tilt | loc: devirmek
  EN TS: She is tipping the apples out.
  tr TS: Kovayı devirip elmaları döküyor.
  EN FS: She is tipping the eggs out.
  tr FS: Kovayı devirip yumurtaları döküyor.
  EN TP: tipping a bucket of apples
  tr TP: bir kova elmayı devirmek
  EN FP: tipping the waiter
  tr FP: garsona bahşiş vermek
4455 | site (noun): the piece of land where something is located | loc: arsa
  EN TS: He is working on the site.
  tr TS: Arsada çalışıyor.
  EN FS: He is sleeping on the site.
  tr FS: Arsada uyuyor.
  EN TP: a building site
  tr TP: bir inşaat arsası
  EN FP: a camping site
  tr FP: bir kamp alanı
4456 | modern (adjective): belonging to the present, modern era | loc: modern
  EN TS: The tower is very modern.
  tr TS: Kule çok modern.
  EN FS: The tower is very old.
  tr FS: Kule çok eski.
  EN TP: a modern glass tower
  tr TP: modern cam bir kule
  EN FP: a modern glass phone
  tr FP: modern cam bir telefon
4457 | crouch (verb): to bend your knees down close to the ground | loc: çömelmek
  EN TS: She is crouching by the fire.
  tr TS: Ateşin yanında çömeliyor.
  EN FS: She is crouching by the car.
  tr FS: Arabanın yanında çömeliyor.
  EN TP: crouching over a fire
  tr TP: ateşin başına çömelmek
  EN FP: crouching behind a rock
  tr FP: kayanın arkasına çömelmek
4458 | disaster (noun): a state of extreme ruin and misfortune | loc: felaket
  EN TS: Total kitchen disaster!
  tr TS: Tam bir mutfak felaketi!
  EN FS: Total garden disaster!
  tr FS: Tam bir bahçe felaketi!
  EN TP: a smoky kitchen disaster
  tr TP: dumanlı bir mutfak felaketi
  EN FP: a natural disaster on TV
  tr FP: televizyonda doğal felaket
4459 | burning (noun): the act of burning something | loc: yakma
  EN TS: A little burning, no problem.
  tr TS: Birazcık yakmışız, sorun yok.
  EN FS: A little rain, no problem.
  tr FS: Birazcık yağmur yağmış, sorun yok.
  EN TP: the burning of a marshmallow
  tr TP: marshmallow yakma
  EN FP: the burning of old letters
  tr FP: eski mektupları yakma
4460 | palm (noun): the inner surface of the hand | loc: avuç içi
  EN TS: She is warming her palms.
  tr TS: Avuç içlerini ısıtıyor.
  EN FS: She is warming her feet.
  tr FS: Ayaklarını ısıtıyor.
  EN TP: palms out to the fire
  tr TP: ateşe uzatılmış avuç içleri
  EN FP: palm trees on the beach
  tr FP: sahilde palmiyeler
4461 | dig (verb): to turn up or remove earth | loc: kazmak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: They are digging. He can't escape.
  tr TS: Kazıyorlar. Artık kaçamaz.
  EN FS: They are swimming. He can't escape.
  tr FS: Yüzüyorlar. Artık kaçamaz.
  EN TP: digging in the sand
  tr TP: kumda kazmak
  EN FP: digging in the garden
  tr FP: bahçede kazmak
4462 | funeral (noun): a ceremony where a dead person is buried | loc: cenaze
  EN TS: A white rose at the funeral.
  tr TS: Cenazede beyaz bir gül.
  EN FS: A red rose at the funeral.
  tr FS: Cenazede kırmızı bir gül.
  EN TP: a funeral in a cemetery
  tr TP: mezarlıkta bir cenaze
  EN FP: a funeral in a church
  tr FP: kilisede bir cenaze
4463 | welcome (verb): to greet someone on arrival | loc: karşılamak
  EN TS: The driver is welcoming them.
  tr TS: Şoför onları karşılıyor.
  EN FS: The pilot is welcoming them.
  tr FS: Pilot onları karşılıyor.
  EN TP: welcoming people on a bus
  tr TP: otobüste insanları karşılamak
  EN FP: welcoming people on a plane
  tr FP: uçakta insanları karşılamak
4464 | read (verb): to look at written words and understand them | loc: okumak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is reading, not waiting.
  tr TS: Kitap okuyor, beklemiyor.
  EN FS: She is eating, not waiting.
  tr FS: Yemek yiyor, beklemiyor.
  EN TP: reading at a bus stop
  tr TP: otobüs durağında okumak
  EN FP: reading on the train
  tr FP: trende okumak
4465 | upstairs (adverb): on a floor above | loc: üst katta
  EN TS: He went upstairs, best day ever!
  tr TS: Üst kata çıktı, hayatının günü!
  EN FS: He went downstairs, best day ever!
  tr FS: Alt kata indi, hayatının günü!
  EN TP: upstairs on a bus
  tr TP: otobüsün üst katında
  EN FP: upstairs in a house
  tr FP: bir evin üst katında
4466 | aboard (adverb): on a ship, train, plane or other vehicle | loc: araçta
  EN TS: All aboard the tour bus!
  tr TS: Herkes araçta mı? Tur otobüsü kalkıyor!
  EN FS: All aboard the ferry!
  tr FS: Herkes araçta mı? Feribot kalkıyor!
  EN TP: aboard a city bus
  tr TP: bir şehir otobüsünde
  EN FP: aboard a cruise ship
  tr FP: bir yolcu gemisinde
4467 | ham (noun): meat from the thigh of a pig, usually smoked | loc: jambon
  EN TS: Hams are hanging on the wall.
  tr TS: Duvarda jambonlar asılı.
  EN FS: Hats are hanging on the wall.
  tr FS: Duvarda şapkalar asılı.
  EN TP: whole hams on hooks
  tr TP: kancalarda bütün jambonlar
  EN FP: a ham sandwich
  tr FP: jambonlu sandviç
4468 | porter (noun): a person employed to carry luggage | loc: hamal
  EN TS: The porter is carrying a lot.
  tr TS: Hamal çok şey taşıyor.
  EN FS: The porter is holding nothing.
  tr FS: Hamal hiçbir şey tutmuyor.
  EN TP: a heavily loaded porter
  tr TP: ağır yüklü bir hamal
  EN FP: a porter at a hotel
  tr FP: otelde bir hamal
4469 | cabinet (noun): a piece of furniture with doors and shelves | loc: dolap
  EN TS: The cabinet is attacking him!
  tr TS: Dolap ona saldırıyor!
  EN FS: The fridge is attacking him!
  tr FS: Buzdolabı ona saldırıyor!
  EN TP: opening the kitchen cabinet
  tr TP: mutfak dolabını açmak
  EN FP: locking the kitchen cabinet
  tr FP: mutfak dolabını kilitlemek
4470 | store (verb): to keep something for future use | loc: saklamak
  EN TS: Plates stored in colour order.
  tr TS: Tabaklar renk sırasına göre saklanıyor.
  EN FS: Cups stored in colour order.
  tr FS: Fincanlar renk sırasına göre saklanıyor.
  EN TP: storing plates in a cupboard
  tr TP: tabakları dolapta saklamak
  EN FP: storing files on a laptop
  tr FP: dosyaları laptopta saklamak
4471 | height (noun): how tall something is, its vertical size | loc: yükseklik
  EN TS: The pylon has a scary height!
  tr TS: Elektrik direğinin yüksekliği korkunç!
  EN FS: The bridge has a scary height!
  tr FS: Köprünün yüksekliği korkunç!
  EN TP: the pylon's great height
  tr TP: direğin büyük yüksekliği
  EN FP: the height of a bridge
  tr FP: bir köprünün yüksekliği
4472 | altitude (noun): height above sea level | loc: rakım
  EN TS: He can't believe the altitude!
  tr TS: Rakıma inanamıyor!
  EN FS: He can't believe the heat!
  tr FS: Sıcağa inanamıyor!
  EN TP: a cable car at altitude
  tr TP: yüksek rakımda teleferik
  EN FP: the altitude of a plane
  tr FP: bir uçağın rakımı
4473 | yell (verb): to give a sudden loud cry | loc: bağırmak
  EN TS: The cactus made him yell!
  tr TS: Kaktüs yüzünden bağırdı!
  EN FS: The snake made him yell!
  tr FS: Yılan yüzünden bağırdı!
  EN TP: yelling in the desert
  tr TP: çölde bağırmak
  EN FP: yelling in the snow
  tr FP: karda bağırmak
4474 | menu (noun): a list of dishes available at a restaurant | loc: menü
  EN TS: The menu is on the wall.
  tr TS: Menü duvarda.
  EN FS: The menu is on the table.
  tr FS: Menü masada.
  EN TP: a coffee menu on boards
  tr TP: panolarda kahve menüsü
  EN FP: a menu on a phone
  tr FP: telefonda menü
4475 | display (verb): to show something, make it visible | loc: sergilemek
  EN TS: Cups are displayed on shelves.
  tr TS: Fincanlar raflarda sergileniyor.
  EN FS: Jars are displayed on shelves.
  tr FS: Kavanozlar raflarda sergileniyor.
  EN TP: cups displayed on shelves
  tr TP: raflarda sergilenen fincanlar
  EN FP: displaying a price list
  tr FP: fiyat listesini sergilemek
4476 | hall (noun): a large entrance or reception room | loc: salon
  EN TS: What a huge cafe hall!
  tr TS: Ne kocaman bir kafe salonu!
  EN FS: What a tiny cafe hall!
  tr FS: Ne minicik bir kafe salonu!
  EN TP: a huge ornate hall
  tr TP: kocaman süslü bir salon
  EN FP: a school sports hall
  tr FP: okulun spor salonu
4477 | month (noun): one of the twelve parts of the year | loc: ay
  EN TS: He is turning to a new month.
  tr TS: Takvimde yeni aya geçiyor.
  EN FS: He is turning to a new book.
  tr FS: Kitapta yeni bölüme geçiyor.
  EN TP: turning to a new month
  tr TP: yeni aya sayfa çevirmek
  EN FP: a month at the beach
  tr FP: sahilde bir ay
4478 | date (noun): the specified day of the month | loc: tarih
  EN TS: She marked a date. Big day!
  tr TS: Bir tarih işaretledi. Büyük gün!
  EN FS: She marked a name. Big day!
  tr FS: Bir isim işaretledi. Büyük gün!
  EN TP: a date marked in red
  tr TP: kırmızıyla işaretli bir tarih
  EN FP: a date at a restaurant
  tr FP: restoranda bir buluşma
4479 | hard (adjective): not easy, needing great effort | loc: zor
  EN TS: This ride is hard work!
  tr TS: Bu sürüş resmen zor iş!
  EN FS: This ride is easy work!
  tr FS: Bu sürüş resmen kolay iş!
  EN TP: a hard spin class
  tr TP: zor bir spinning dersi
  EN FP: a hard bike seat
  tr FP: sert bir bisiklet selesi
4480 | curve (noun): a line that bends, changing direction | loc: eğri
  EN TS: The dune makes a long curve.
  tr TS: Kum tepesi uzun bir eğri çiziyor.
  EN FS: The river makes a long curve.
  tr FS: Nehir uzun bir eğri çiziyor.
  EN TP: the curve of a dune
  tr TP: bir kum tepesinin eğrisi
  EN FP: a curve in the road
  tr FP: yolda bir viraj
4481 | focus (verb): to bring something to a central point | loc: odaklamak
  EN TS: She is focusing like a pro.
  tr TS: Objektifi tam bir profesyonel gibi odaklıyor.
  EN FS: She is cooking like a pro.
  tr FS: Yemeği tam bir profesyonel gibi pişiriyor.
  EN TP: to focus the lens
  tr TP: objektifi odaklamak
  EN FP: to focus on homework
  tr FP: ödeve odaklanmak
4482 | shoot (verb): to make a film or photograph of something | loc: çekmek | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is shooting the rooftops.
  tr TS: Çatıların fotoğrafını çekiyor.
  EN FS: She is shooting the beach.
  tr FS: Sahilin fotoğrafını çekiyor.
  EN TP: shooting photos in the city
  tr TP: şehirde fotoğraf çekmek
  EN FP: shooting at a target
  tr FP: hedefe ateş etmek
4483 | log (noun): a piece of a tree trunk with the branches cut off | loc: kütük
  EN TS: The cabin is made of logs.
  tr TS: Kulübe kütüklerden yapılmış.
  EN FS: The cabin is made of bricks.
  tr FS: Kulübe tuğladan yapılmış.
  EN TP: a cabin of stacked logs
  tr TP: üst üste kütüklerden kulübe
  EN FP: a log on the ice
  tr FP: buzun üstünde bir kütük
4484 | dawn (noun): the first light of day | loc: şafak
  EN TS: Dawn lights up the peaks first.
  tr TS: Şafak önce zirveleri aydınlatıyor.
  EN FS: Dawn lights up the trees first.
  tr FS: Şafak önce ağaçları aydınlatıyor.
  EN TP: the first light of dawn
  tr TP: şafağın ilk ışığı
  EN FP: dawn in a busy city
  tr FP: kalabalık bir şehirde şafak
4485 | powerful (adjective): having great power or force | loc: güçlü
  EN TS: Powerful falls, free shower!
  tr TS: Güçlü şelale, bedava duş!
  EN FS: Powerful rain, free shower!
  tr FS: Güçlü yağmur, bedava duş!
  EN TP: a powerful waterfall
  tr TP: güçlü bir şelale
  EN FP: a powerful canoe engine
  tr FP: güçlü bir kano motoru
4487 | kind (adjective): having a considerate and helpful nature | loc: nazik
  EN TS: What a kind guy!
  tr TS: Ne kadar nazik biri!
  EN FS: What a lazy guy!
  tr FS: Ne kadar tembel biri!
  EN TP: a kind young man
  tr TP: nazik genç bir adam
  EN FP: a kind of pancake
  tr FP: bir çeşit krep
4488 | document (noun): an official piece of writing with information | loc: belge
  EN TS: Every document gets a red X. Bad day at the office.
  tr TS: Her belgeye kırmızı çarpı. Ofiste zor bir gün.
  EN FS: Every document gets a green tick. Bad day at the office.
  tr FS: Her belgeye yeşil tik. Ofiste zor bir gün.
  EN TP: stamping a document
  tr TP: belge damgalamak
  EN FP: printing a document
  tr FP: belge yazdırmak
4489 | wax (noun): a soft substance from plant, animal or mineral | loc: balmumu
  EN TS: Melted wax is everywhere.
  tr TS: Her yer erimiş balmumu.
  EN FS: Melted butter is everywhere.
  tr FS: Her yer erimiş tereyağı.
  EN TP: melted candle wax
  tr TP: erimiş balmumu
  EN FP: a wax figure
  tr FP: bir balmumu heykel
4490 | prepare (verb): to make ready in advance | loc: hazırlamak
  EN TS: She is preparing the table.
  tr TS: Masayı hazırlıyor.
  EN FS: She is cleaning the table.
  tr FS: Masayı temizliyor.
  EN TP: preparing a dinner table
  tr TP: akşam yemeği masası hazırlamak
  EN FP: preparing for a test
  tr FP: sınava hazırlanmak
4491 | below (adverb): in or to a lower place | loc: aşağıda
  EN TS: The river is far below.
  tr TS: Nehir çok aşağıda.
  EN FS: The sun is far below.
  tr FS: Güneş çok aşağıda.
  EN TP: a river far below
  tr TP: çok aşağıda bir nehir
  EN FP: clouds far below
  tr FP: çok aşağıda bulutlar
4492 | impressive (adjective): making a strong impression | loc: etkileyici
  EN TS: The golden dome is impressive.
  tr TS: Altın kubbe etkileyici.
  EN FS: The silver dome is impressive.
  tr FS: Gümüş kubbe etkileyici.
  EN TP: an impressive golden dome
  tr TP: etkileyici altın bir kubbe
  EN FP: an impressive exam result
  tr FP: etkileyici bir sınav sonucu
4493 | struggle (verb): to make a strenuous effort | loc: mücadele etmek
  EN TS: He is struggling at the wheel.
  tr TS: Direksiyonda mücadele ediyor.
  EN FS: He is sleeping at the wheel.
  tr FS: Direksiyonda uyuyor.
  EN TP: struggling with the wheel
  tr TP: direksiyonla mücadele etmek
  EN FP: struggling with a heavy bag
  tr FP: ağır bir çantayla mücadele etmek
4495 | cost (noun): the total spent for goods or services | loc: maliyet
  EN TS: The cost of the old car is 500 euros.
  tr TS: Eski arabanın maliyeti 500 euro.
  EN FS: The cost of the old car is 5,000 euros.
  tr FS: Eski arabanın maliyeti 5.000 euro.
  EN TP: the cost of a car
  tr TP: bir arabanın maliyeti
  EN FP: the cost of a flat
  tr FP: bir dairenin maliyeti
4496 | lay (verb): to put something in a certain place | loc: koymak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He laid the rug on the floor.
  tr TS: Halıyı yere koydu.
  EN FS: He laid the rug on the bed.
  tr FS: Halıyı yatağa koydu.
  EN TP: to lay a rug down
  tr TP: halıyı yere koymak
  EN FP: to lay the table
  tr FP: sofrayı kurmak
4497 | hand (verb): to place something into someone's hands | loc: uzatmak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is handing over a coin.
  tr TS: Bir bozuk para uzatıyor.
  EN FS: He is handing over a key.
  tr FS: Bir anahtar uzatıyor.
  EN TP: handing over the change
  tr TP: para üstünü uzatmak
  EN FP: handing over a gift
  tr FP: hediye uzatmak
4498 | sign (verb): to mark with your signature | loc: imzalamak
  EN TS: Friends are signing his cast.
  tr TS: Arkadaşları alçısını imzalıyor.
  EN FS: Friends are signing his shirt.
  tr FS: Arkadaşları tişörtünü imzalıyor.
  EN TP: signing a plaster cast
  tr TP: alçıyı imzalamak
  EN FP: signing a contract
  tr FP: sözleşme imzalamak
4499 | visit (verb): to go to see a place | loc: ziyaret etmek
  EN TS: Castles: he visits them all.
  tr TS: Kaleler mi? Hepsini ziyaret ediyor.
  EN FS: Farms: he visits them all.
  tr FS: Çiftlikler mi? Hepsini ziyaret ediyor.
  EN TP: visiting old castles
  tr TP: eski kaleleri ziyaret etmek
  EN FP: visiting old friends
  tr FP: eski arkadaşları ziyaret etmek
4500 | quick (adjective): done rapidly, without delay | loc: hızlı
  EN TS: Quick hands save the day.
  tr TS: Hızlı eller günü kurtarıyor.
  EN FS: Quick dogs save the day.
  tr FS: Hızlı köpekler günü kurtarıyor.
  EN TP: a quick catch
  tr TP: hızlı bir yakalayış
  EN FP: a quick nap
  tr FP: hızlı bir kestirme
4501 | insect (noun): a small air-breathing creature with six legs | loc: böcek
  EN TS: This insect had a snack.
  tr TS: Bu böcek atıştırmış.
  EN FS: This bird had a snack.
  tr FS: Bu kuş atıştırmış.
  EN TP: an insect on a leaf
  tr TP: yaprakta bir böcek
  EN FP: an insect on a flower
  tr FP: çiçekte bir böcek
4502 | ceiling (noun): the upper surface of a room, overhead | loc: tavan
  EN TS: Ceilings are so interesting.
  tr TS: Tavanlar çok ilginç.
  EN FS: Floors are so interesting.
  tr FS: Zeminler çok ilginç.
  EN TP: looking up at the ceiling
  tr TP: tavana bakmak
  EN FP: painting the ceiling
  tr FP: tavanı boyamak
4503 | wish (verb): to hope for something | loc: dilemek | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is making a wish.
  tr TS: Bir dilek diliyor.
  EN FS: She is making a cake.
  tr FS: Bir pasta yapıyor.
  EN TP: making a birthday wish
  tr TP: doğum günü dileği dilemek
  EN FP: wishing for rain
  tr FP: yağmur dilemek
4504 | success (noun): an event that achieves its intended purpose | loc: başarı
  EN TS: What a success!
  tr TS: Ne başarı ama!
  EN FS: What a failure!
  tr FS: Ne başarısızlık ama!
  EN TP: celebrating a big success
  tr TP: büyük bir başarıyı kutlamak
  EN FP: a success on stage
  tr FP: sahnede bir başarı
4505 | backwards (adverb): toward the back or rear | loc: geriye
  EN TS: He is falling over backwards!
  tr TS: Geriye doğru düşüyor!
  EN FS: He is falling over forwards!
  tr FS: İleriye doğru düşüyor!
  EN TP: falling backwards off a chair
  tr TP: sandalyeden geriye düşmek
  EN FP: walking backwards to the table
  tr FP: masaya geri geri yürümek
4506 | comfort (noun): a relaxed state with no pain | loc: rahatlık
  EN TS: Comfort? The green chair wins.
  tr TS: Rahatlık mı? Yeşil koltuk kazanır.
  EN FS: Comfort? The white chair wins.
  tr FS: Rahatlık mı? Beyaz koltuk kazanır.
  EN TP: comfort in a big armchair
  tr TP: büyük bir koltukta rahatlık
  EN FP: comfort on a kitchen chair
  tr FP: mutfak sandalyesinde rahatlık
4507 | tag (noun): a label attached to something, showing its owner | loc: etiket
  EN TS: The agent is attaching a tag.
  tr TS: Görevli bir etiket takıyor.
  EN FS: The agent is attaching a lock.
  tr FS: Görevli bir kilit takıyor.
  EN TP: a tag on a suitcase
  tr TP: valizde bir etiket
  EN FP: a jacket name tag
  tr FP: ceket isim etiketi
4508 | load (verb): to fill or place a load on something | loc: yüklemek | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He's loading bags like a boss.
  tr TS: Çantaları patron gibi yüklüyor.
  EN FS: He's loading food like a boss.
  tr FS: Yiyecekleri patron gibi yüklüyor.
  EN TP: loading bags onto the belt
  tr TP: çantaları banda yüklemek
  EN FP: loading a truck with boxes
  tr FP: kamyona kutu yüklemek
4509 | weigh (verb): to have a certain weight | loc: ağırlığında olmak
  EN TS: The bag weighs 12.95 kg. Accepted.
  tr TS: Çanta 12,95 kg ağırlığında. Kabul.
  EN FS: The bag weighs 21.95 kg. Accepted.
  tr FS: Çanta 21,95 kg ağırlığında. Kabul.
  EN TP: weighing a bag
  tr TP: bir çantayı tartmak
  EN FP: weighing the fruit
  tr FP: meyveyi tartmak
4510 | check (verb): to examine something to see if it is right | loc: kontrol etmek
  EN TS: She is checking her ticket. Wrong gate?
  tr TS: Biletini kontrol ediyor. Yanlış kapı mı?
  EN FS: She is checking her phone. Wrong gate?
  tr FS: Telefonunu kontrol ediyor. Yanlış kapı mı?
  EN TP: checking the flight board
  tr TP: uçuş panosunu kontrol etmek
  EN FP: checking her bag
  tr FP: çantasını kontrol etmek
4511 | service (noun): work done by one person that benefits another | loc: hizmet
  EN TS: The service here is excellent.
  tr TS: Buradaki hizmet mükemmel.
  EN FS: The service here is rude.
  tr FS: Buradaki hizmet kaba.
  EN TP: friendly service at a desk
  tr TP: bankoda güler yüzlü hizmet
  EN FP: room service in a hotel
  tr FP: otelde oda servisi
4512 | list (noun): an ordered set of names or items | loc: liste
  EN TS: He is checking his list.
  tr TS: Listesini kontrol ediyor.
  EN FS: He is checking his phone.
  tr FS: Telefonunu kontrol ediyor.
  EN TP: ticking off a list
  tr TP: listeden işaretlemek
  EN FP: writing a shopping list
  tr FP: alışveriş listesi yazmak
4513 | suitcase (noun): a large case with a handle for carrying clothes | loc: valiz
  EN TS: All good: suitcase and ticket.
  tr TS: Her şey tamam: valiz ve bilet.
  EN FS: All good: backpack and ticket.
  tr FS: Her şey tamam: sırt çantası ve bilet.
  EN TP: a suitcase at the airport
  tr TP: havalimanında bir valiz
  EN FP: a suitcase on a train
  tr FP: trende bir valiz
4514 | skill (noun): an ability you gain by training | loc: beceri
  EN TS: The chef has crazy skills.
  tr TS: Şefin becerileri çılgın.
  EN FS: The waiter has crazy skills.
  tr FS: Garsonun becerileri çılgın.
  EN TP: a chef's cooking skill
  tr TP: bir şefin yemek becerisi
  EN FP: a juggling skill
  tr FP: jonglörlük becerisi
4515 | to win (verb): to be the winner in a contest | loc: kazanmak
  EN TS: He won a medal. You bet!
  tr TS: Madalya kazandı. Tabii ki!
  EN FS: He won a cup. You bet!
  tr FS: Kupa kazandı. Tabii ki!
  EN TP: to win a medal
  tr TP: madalya kazanmak
  EN FP: to win a car
  tr FP: araba kazanmak
4516 | hay (noun): dried grass used as food for animals | loc: kuru ot
  EN TS: The barn floor is full of hay.
  tr TS: Ahırın zemini kuru otla dolu.
  EN FS: The barn floor is full of mud.
  tr FS: Ahırın zemini çamurla dolu.
  EN TP: a nest made of hay
  tr TP: kuru ottan bir yuva
  EN FP: hay bales on a truck
  tr FP: kamyonda kuru ot balyaları
4517 | pull (noun): the act of pulling something toward you | loc: çekiş
  EN TS: He is giving the rope a pull.
  tr TS: İpe tek bir çekişle asılıyor.
  EN FS: He is giving the rope a cut.
  tr FS: İpi tek bir kesişle koparıyor.
  EN TP: a pull on the rope
  tr TP: ipe bir çekiş
  EN FP: the pull of the moon
  tr FP: ayın çekimi
4519 | ash (noun): what remains when something is burned | loc: kül
  EN TS: He's stacking logs on the ash.
  tr TS: Odunları külün üstüne diziyor.
  EN FS: He's stacking logs on the rug.
  tr FS: Odunları halının üstüne diziyor.
  EN TP: a thick bed of ash
  tr TP: kalın bir kül tabakası
  EN FP: an old ash tree
  tr FP: yaşlı bir dişbudak ağacı
4520 | stretch (verb): to spread over a large, long area | loc: uzanmak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The wall stretches forever.
  tr TS: Sur sonsuza kadar uzanıyor.
  EN FS: The river stretches forever.
  tr FS: Nehir sonsuza kadar uzanıyor.
  EN TP: stretching over the mountains
  tr TP: dağların üstüne uzanmak
  EN FP: stretching before a run
  tr FP: koşudan önce esnemek
4521 | distance (noun): a far away region | loc: uzaklık
  EN TS: Towers fade in the distance.
  tr TS: Kuleler uzaklıkta siliniyor.
  EN FS: Houses fade in the distance.
  tr FS: Evler uzaklıkta siliniyor.
  EN TP: towers in the distance
  tr TP: uzaklıkta kuleler
  EN FP: a long-distance phone call
  tr FP: şehirlerarası telefon görüşmesi
4522 | tour (noun): a journey all the way around a place | loc: tur
  EN TS: Her tour has a wall, a boat and dumplings!
  tr TS: Turunda sur, tekne ve mantı var!
  EN FS: Her tour has a wall, a boat and pizza!
  tr FS: Turunda sur, tekne ve pizza var!
  EN TP: a tour of China
  tr TP: bir Çin turu
  EN FP: a tour of Italy
  tr FP: bir İtalya turu
4524 | fold (verb): to bend so that one part covers the other | loc: katlamak
  EN TS: Perfectly folded dumplings.
  tr TS: Kusursuz katlanmış mantılar.
  EN FS: Perfectly folded napkins.
  tr FS: Kusursuz katlanmış peçeteler.
  EN TP: folding dumpling edges
  tr TP: mantı kenarlarını katlamak
  EN FP: folding clean laundry
  tr FP: temiz çamaşırları katlamak
4525 | help (verb): to give help or assistance to someone | loc: yardım etmek
  EN TS: She helped him breathe again.
  tr TS: Tekrar nefes almasına yardım etti.
  EN FS: She helped him stand up again.
  tr FS: Tekrar ayağa kalkmasına yardım etti.
  EN TP: helping a choking man
  tr TP: boğulmak üzere olan adama yardım etmek
  EN FP: helping with the dishes
  tr FP: bulaşıklara yardım etmek
4526 | election (noun): a vote to choose a winner for a position | loc: seçim
  EN TS: She is thinking very hard about this election.
  tr TS: Kadın bu seçim hakkında çok derin düşünüyor.
  EN FS: He is thinking very hard about this election.
  tr FS: Adam bu seçim hakkında çok derin düşünüyor.
  EN TP: voting in an election
  tr TP: seçimde oy vermek
  EN FP: winning an election
  tr FP: seçimi kazanmak
4527 | vegetable (noun): a plant part you eat, like roots, leaves or stems | loc: sebze
  EN TS: He is chopping vegetables!
  tr TS: Sebze doğruyor!
  EN FS: He is chopping meat!
  tr FS: Et doğruyor!
  EN TP: chopping vegetables
  tr TP: sebze doğramak
  EN FP: washing vegetables
  tr FP: sebze yıkamak
4528 | grave (noun): a place in the ground where a dead body is buried | loc: mezar
  EN TS: Old graves surround the church.
  tr TS: Kiliseyi eski mezarlar çevreliyor.
  EN FS: Old graves surround the castle.
  tr FS: Kaleyi eski mezarlar çevreliyor.
  EN TP: graves around a church
  tr TP: kilisenin etrafında mezarlar
  EN FP: graves on a battlefield
  tr FP: savaş alanında mezarlar
4529 | color (noun): what things look like from the light they reflect | loc: renk
  EN TS: Floor full of color. Magic!
  tr TS: Zemin renk dolu. Büyü gibi!
  EN FS: Floor full of water. Magic!
  tr FS: Zemin su dolu. Büyü gibi!
  EN TP: colors on a stone floor
  tr TP: taş zeminde renkler
  EN FP: colors on a painted wall
  tr FP: boyalı duvarda renkler
4530 | film (noun): a story told with moving pictures and sound | loc: film
  EN TS: Popcorn is flying at the film!
  tr TS: Filmde patlamış mısırlar uçuşuyor!
  EN FS: Drinks are flying at the film!
  tr FS: Filmde içecekler uçuşuyor!
  EN TP: watching a film
  tr TP: film izlemek
  EN FP: making a film
  tr FP: film çekmek
4531 | popcorn (noun): corn heated until it bursts into white pieces | loc: patlamış mısır
  EN TS: She is ready with her popcorn.
  tr TS: Patlamış mısırıyla hazır.
  EN FS: She is ready with her pizza.
  tr FS: Pizzasıyla hazır.
  EN TP: a big tub of popcorn
  tr TP: kocaman bir kova patlamış mısır
  EN FP: making popcorn at home
  tr FP: evde patlamış mısır yapmak
4532 | trash (noun): worthless material to be thrown away | loc: çöp
  EN TS: Park duty: picking up trash.
  tr TS: Park görevi: çöp toplama.
  EN FS: Park duty: picking up flowers.
  tr FS: Park görevi: çiçek toplama.
  EN TP: picking up park trash
  tr TP: parktaki çöpleri toplamak
  EN FP: a full trash can
  tr FP: dolu bir çöp kutusu
4533 | court (noun): a room in which a law court sits | loc: mahkeme salonu
  EN TS: They are celebrating in court.
  tr TS: Mahkeme salonunda kutlama yapıyorlar.
  EN FS: They are crying in court.
  tr FS: Mahkeme salonunda ağlıyorlar.
  EN TP: a happy family in court
  tr TP: mahkeme salonunda mutlu bir aile
  EN FP: a tennis court party
  tr FP: tenis kortunda parti
4534 | official (noun): a worker who holds an office | loc: yetkili
  EN TS: The official wears a chain.
  tr TS: Yetkili bir zincir takıyor.
  EN FS: The official wears a crown.
  tr FS: Yetkili bir taç takıyor.
  EN TP: an official with a chain
  tr TP: zincirli bir yetkili
  EN FP: an official stamping passports
  tr FP: pasaport damgalayan yetkili
4535 | lesson (noun): a unit of instruction | loc: ders
  EN TS: He is throwing paper during the lesson!
  tr TS: Ders sırasında kâğıt atıyor!
  EN FS: He is throwing chalk during the lesson!
  tr FS: Ders sırasında tebeşir atıyor!
  EN TP: a math lesson
  tr TP: bir matematik dersi
  EN FP: a swimming lesson
  tr FP: bir yüzme dersi
4536 | craft (noun): the skilled practice of a practical job | loc: zanaat
  EN TS: The craft here is pottery.
  tr TS: Buradaki zanaat çömlekçilik.
  EN FS: The craft here is painting.
  tr FS: Buradaki zanaat ressamlık.
  EN TP: the craft of pottery
  tr TP: çömlekçilik zanaatı
  EN FP: the craft of glassmaking
  tr FP: cam işçiliği zanaatı
4537 | clear (verb): to rid a place of obstructions | loc: boşaltmak
  EN TS: She cleared the whole flat. Then she collapsed.
  tr TS: Bütün evi boşalttı. Sonra yığılıp kaldı.
  EN FS: She cleared the whole flat. Then she danced.
  tr FS: Bütün evi boşalttı. Sonra dans etti.
  EN TP: clearing the shelves
  tr TP: rafları boşaltmak
  EN FP: clearing her throat
  tr FP: boğazını temizlemek
4538 | rest (noun): freedom from work or activity | loc: dinlenme
  EN TS: Task done. Time for a rest.
  tr TS: Görev tamam. Dinlenme vakti.
  EN FS: Task done. Time for a run.
  tr FS: Görev tamam. Koşu vakti.
  EN TP: a rest on the sofa
  tr TP: kanepede dinlenme
  EN FP: a highway rest stop
  tr FP: otoyol dinlenme tesisi
4539 | cartoon (noun): a humorous drawing in a newspaper | loc: karikatür
  EN TS: The cartoon man is mopping.
  tr TS: Karikatürdeki adam paspas yapıyor.
  EN FS: The cartoon man is cooking.
  tr FS: Karikatürdeki adam yemek yapıyor.
  EN TP: a cartoon of a cleaner
  tr TP: bir temizlikçi karikatürü
  EN FP: a cartoon of a cook
  tr FP: bir aşçı karikatürü
4540 | equipment (noun): the things needed to do a job or service | loc: ekipman
  EN TS: Proper safety equipment.
  tr TS: Doğru dürüst güvenlik ekipmanı.
  EN FS: Proper diving equipment.
  tr FS: Doğru dürüst dalış ekipmanı.
  EN TP: window-cleaning equipment
  tr TP: cam temizleme ekipmanı
  EN FP: gym equipment in a hall
  tr FP: salonda spor ekipmanı
4541 | filthy (adjective): disgustingly dirty | loc: pis
  EN TS: The sink was filthy with hair!
  tr TS: Lavabo saç yüzünden pis mi pisti!
  EN FS: The sink was filthy with mud!
  tr FS: Lavabo çamur yüzünden pis mi pisti!
  EN TP: a filthy hairy basin
  tr TP: kıl dolu pis bir lavabo
  EN FP: filthy boots by the door
  tr FP: kapının yanında pis botlar
4542 | agreement (noun): a statement of promises exchanged | loc: anlaşma
  EN TS: They reached an agreement.
  tr TS: Anlaşmaya vardılar.
  EN FS: They reached the airport.
  tr FS: Havalimanına vardılar.
  EN TP: shaking hands on an agreement
  tr TP: anlaşma için el sıkışmak
  EN FP: a rental agreement
  tr FP: bir kira anlaşması
4543 | risk (noun): a source of danger, a chance of loss | loc: risk
  EN TS: That thin rope is a tiny risk.
  tr TS: O ince ip ufacık bir risk.
  EN FS: That ladder is a tiny risk.
  tr FS: O merdiven ufacık bir risk.
  EN TP: risk on a sea cliff
  tr TP: deniz uçurumunda risk
  EN FP: risk in a casino
  tr FP: kumarhanede risk
4544 | contrast (noun): the difference between things that are compared | loc: karşıtlık
  EN TS: Sand and ice. Small contrast.
  tr TS: Kum ve buz. Ufak bir karşıtlık.
  EN FS: Sea and ice. Small contrast.
  tr FS: Deniz ve buz. Ufak bir karşıtlık.
  EN TP: sand and ice in contrast
  tr TP: kum ve buzun karşıtlığı
  EN FP: day and night in contrast
  tr FP: gece ve gündüzün karşıtlığı
4545 | strength (noun): being physically or mentally strong | loc: güç
  EN TS: She has huge finger strength.
  tr TS: Kızın parmaklarında müthiş bir güç var.
  EN FS: He has huge finger strength.
  tr FS: Adamın parmaklarında müthiş bir güç var.
  EN TP: strength in her fingers
  tr TP: parmaklarındaki güç
  EN FP: strength in her legs
  tr FP: bacaklarındaki güç
4546 | surgery (noun): a room where you see a doctor or dentist | loc: muayenehane
  EN TS: The surgery has a green couch.
  tr TS: Muayenehanede yeşil bir sedye var.
  EN FS: The surgery has a red couch.
  tr FS: Muayenehanede kırmızı bir sedye var.
  EN TP: a boy in the surgery
  tr TP: muayenehanede bir çocuk
  EN FP: a boy having surgery
  tr FP: ameliyat olan bir çocuk
4547 | waiting room (noun): a room with seats where people wait | loc: bekleme salonu
  EN TS: They are in the waiting room.
  tr TS: Bekleme salonundalar.
  EN FS: They are in the dining room.
  tr FS: Yemek salonundalar.
  EN TP: sitting in a waiting room
  tr TP: bekleme salonunda oturmak
  EN FP: sitting in a living room
  tr FP: oturma odasında oturmak
4548 | late (adverb): later than usual or expected | loc: geç
  EN TS: Oh no, he woke up late!
  tr TS: Eyvah, geç uyandı!
  EN FS: Oh no, he woke up early!
  tr FS: Eyvah, erken uyandı!
  EN TP: waking up late
  tr TP: geç uyanmak
  EN FP: working late
  tr FP: geç saate kadar çalışmak
4549 | fuel (noun): a substance burned to produce energy | loc: yakıt
  EN TS: He is shovelling fuel.
  tr TS: Kürekle yakıt atıyor.
  EN FS: He is shovelling snow.
  tr FS: Kürekle kar atıyor.
  EN TP: shovelling black fuel
  tr TP: kürekle kara yakıt atmak
  EN FP: fuel for a rocket
  tr FP: roket yakıtı
4550 | finally (adverb): after a long delay, at last | loc: sonunda
  EN TS: Finally, coffee. She is alive.
  tr TS: Sonunda kahve. Kız hayata döndü.
  EN FS: Finally, tea. She is alive.
  tr FS: Sonunda çay. Kız hayata döndü.
  EN TP: finally drinking coffee
  tr TP: sonunda kahve içmek
  EN FP: finally going to bed
  tr FP: sonunda yatmaya gitmek
4551 | camp (verb): to live in a tent | loc: kamp yapmak
  EN TS: Cheap tent. Great camping!
  tr TS: Ucuz çadır. Harika kamp!
  EN FS: Cheap car. Great camping!
  tr FS: Ucuz araba. Harika kamp!
  EN TP: camping by a lake
  tr TP: göl kenarında kamp yapmak
  EN FP: camping in the snow
  tr FP: karda kamp yapmak
4553 | hair (noun): the threadlike growth covering the head | loc: saç
  EN TS: One brush for her hair, then the same one for the dog.
  tr TS: Aynı fırça önce saçına, sonra köpeğe.
  EN FS: One brush for her hair, then the same one for the cat.
  tr FS: Aynı fırça önce saçına, sonra kediye.
  EN TP: brushing long dark hair
  tr TP: uzun koyu saçları taramak
  EN FP: dog hair on a sofa
  tr FP: kanepede köpek tüyü
4554 | flame (noun): the bright burning part of a fire or candle | loc: alev
  EN TS: A wall of flame, and he keeps cooking.
  tr TS: Koca bir alev duvarı, o hâlâ yemek yapıyor.
  EN FS: A wall of water, and he keeps cooking.
  tr FS: Koca bir su duvarı, o hâlâ yemek yapıyor.
  EN TP: a wall of orange flame
  tr TP: turuncu bir alev duvarı
  EN FP: a candle flame at dinner
  tr FP: akşam yemeğinde mum alevi
4555 | pine (noun): a tall evergreen tree with needles | loc: çam
  EN TS: Pines below, peaks ahead.
  tr TS: Aşağıda çamlar, önde zirveler.
  EN FS: Palms below, peaks ahead.
  tr FS: Aşağıda palmiyeler, önde zirveler.
  EN TP: rows of snowy pines
  tr TP: sıra sıra karlı çamlar
  EN FP: a pine kitchen table
  tr FP: çam bir mutfak masası
4556 | praise (verb): to express approval of someone | loc: övmek | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The whole team is praising him.
  tr TS: Bütün ekip onu övüyor.
  EN FS: The whole team is ignoring him.
  tr FS: Bütün ekip onu görmezden geliyor.
  EN TP: praising a colleague
  tr TP: bir iş arkadaşını övmek
  EN FP: praising a dog
  tr FP: bir köpeği övmek
4557 | lap (noun): the top of your thighs when you sit | loc: kucak
  EN TS: The dog stole his lap!
  tr TS: Köpek kucağını kaptı!
  EN FS: The cat stole his lap!
  tr FS: Kedi kucağını kaptı!
  EN TP: a dog on his lap
  tr TP: kucağında bir köpek
  EN FP: a lap around the track
  tr FP: pistte bir tur
4558 | support (noun): help given to a person or cause | loc: destek
  EN TS: His friends are his support.
  tr TS: Arkadaşları onun desteği.
  EN FS: His parents are his support.
  tr FS: Annesiyle babası onun desteği.
  EN TP: support from friends
  tr TP: arkadaşlardan destek
  EN FP: support from his parents
  tr FP: anne babasından destek
4559 | console (verb): to give emotional strength to someone sad | loc: teselli etmek
  EN TS: Friends are consoling him.
  tr TS: Arkadaşları onu teselli ediyor.
  EN FS: Friends are teasing him.
  tr FS: Arkadaşları onunla dalga geçiyor.
  EN TP: consoling a crying friend
  tr TP: ağlayan bir arkadaşı teselli etmek
  EN FP: playing on a console
  tr FP: konsolda oyun oynamak
4560 | crew (noun): the men and women who run a ship or aircraft | loc: mürettebat
  EN TS: The crew is rowing in time.
  tr TS: Mürettebat uyum içinde kürek çekiyor.
  EN FS: The crew is singing in time.
  tr FS: Mürettebat uyum içinde şarkı söylüyor.
  EN TP: a rowing crew
  tr TP: bir kürek mürettebatı
  EN FP: a film crew
  tr FP: bir film ekibi
4561 | command (noun): an instruction with authority to do something | loc: komut
  EN TS: She is shouting commands.
  tr TS: Bağırarak komut veriyor.
  EN FS: She is whispering commands.
  tr FS: Fısıldayarak komut veriyor.
  EN TP: shouting commands
  tr TP: bağırarak komut vermek
  EN FP: typing commands
  tr FP: komut yazmak
4562 | direction (noun): the line leading to a place | loc: yön
  EN TS: She is checking the direction. Serious face.
  tr TS: Yönü kontrol ediyor. Ciddi surat.
  EN FS: She is checking the time. Serious face.
  tr FS: Saati kontrol ediyor. Ciddi surat.
  EN TP: finding the right direction
  tr TP: doğru yönü bulmak
  EN FP: asking for directions
  tr FP: yol tarifi sormak
4563 | law (noun): a legal document of rules for an activity | loc: kanun
  EN TS: The law book has gold corners.
  tr TS: Kanun kitabının altın köşeleri var.
  EN FS: The law book has iron corners.
  tr FS: Kanun kitabının demir köşeleri var.
  EN TP: a huge book of law
  tr TP: kocaman bir kanun kitabı
  EN FP: breaking the law
  tr FP: kanunu çiğnemek
4564 | cooperation (noun): working together, joint action | loc: iş birliği
  EN TS: The barn needs cooperation.
  tr TS: Ahır iş birliği istiyor.
  EN FS: The boat needs cooperation.
  tr FS: Tekne iş birliği istiyor.
  EN TP: cooperation at a barn raising
  tr TP: ahır yapımında iş birliği
  EN FP: cooperation between countries
  tr FP: ülkeler arasında iş birliği
4565 | globe (noun): an object shaped like a ball | loc: küre
  EN TS: The Earth looks like a globe.
  tr TS: Dünya bir küreye benziyor.
  EN FS: The Moon looks like a globe.
  tr FS: Ay bir küreye benziyor.
  EN TP: a blue and green globe
  tr TP: mavi yeşil bir küre
  EN FP: a globe on a desk
  tr FP: masada bir küre
4566 | summit (noun): the top point of a mountain or hill | loc: zirve
  EN TS: She is reaching the summit!
  tr TS: Zirveye ulaşıyor!
  EN FS: She is reaching the river!
  tr FS: Nehre ulaşıyor!
  EN TP: reaching the summit
  tr TP: zirveye ulaşmak
  EN FP: a summit of world leaders
  tr FP: dünya liderleri zirvesi
4567 | ill (adjective): affected by a physical or mental problem | loc: hasta
  EN TS: She looks a bit ill.
  tr TS: Biraz hasta görünüyor.
  EN FS: She looks very happy.
  tr FS: Çok mutlu görünüyor.
  EN TP: ill and coughing
  tr TP: hasta ve öksürüyor
  EN FP: ill in bed
  tr FP: yatakta hasta
4568 | continent (noun): one of the large landmasses of the earth | loc: kıta
  EN TS: She is jumping on every continent. Cheap travel!
  tr TS: Kız her kıtanın üstünde zıplıyor. Ucuz seyahat!
  EN FS: He is jumping on every continent. Cheap travel!
  tr FS: Adam her kıtanın üstünde zıplıyor. Ucuz seyahat!
  EN TP: jumping on a continent
  tr TP: bir kıtada zıplamak
  EN FP: drawing a continent
  tr FP: bir kıta çizmek
4569 | to fry (verb): to cook food in hot oil in a pan | loc: kızartmak
  EN TS: He is frying fish. Van life!
  tr TS: Balık kızartıyor. Karavan hayatı!
  EN FS: He is frying eggs. Van life!
  tr FS: Yumurta kızartıyor. Karavan hayatı!
  EN TP: frying fish in a van
  tr TP: karavanda balık kızartmak
  EN FP: frying fish on a boat
  tr FP: teknede balık kızartmak
4570 | chef (noun): a professional cook | loc: şef
  EN TS: The chef is plating pork.
  tr TS: Şef domuz etini tabağa diziyor.
  EN FS: The chef is plating fish.
  tr FS: Şef balığı tabağa diziyor.
  EN TP: a chef plating a dish
  tr TP: yemeği tabağa dizen bir şef
  EN FP: a chef eating a dish
  tr FP: yemeği yiyen bir şef
4571 | push (verb): to move something with force | loc: itmek | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Everyone is pushing the boat.
  tr TS: Herkes tekneyi itiyor.
  EN FS: Everyone is pushing the car.
  tr FS: Herkes arabayı itiyor.
  EN TP: pushing a boat to sea
  tr TP: tekneyi denize itmek
  EN FP: pushing a car uphill
  tr FP: arabayı yokuş yukarı itmek
4572 | correct (verb): to make something right | loc: düzeltmek
  EN TS: She will correct them forever.
  tr TS: Kız onları sonsuza dek düzeltecek.
  EN FS: He will correct them forever.
  tr FS: Adam onları sonsuza dek düzeltecek.
  EN TP: correcting exam papers
  tr TP: sınav kâğıtlarını düzeltmek
  EN FP: correcting her posture
  tr FP: duruşunu düzeltmek
4573 | secret (adjective): kept private, not open or public | loc: gizli
  EN TS: A secret deal over cash.
  tr TS: Nakit üstüne gizli bir anlaşma.
  EN FS: A secret deal over coffee.
  tr FS: Kahve üstüne gizli bir anlaşma.
  EN TP: a secret cash deal
  tr TP: gizli bir nakit anlaşması
  EN FP: a secret love letter
  tr FP: gizli bir aşk mektubu
4575 | cold (noun): a mild viral infection of the nose and throat | loc: soğuk algınlığı
  EN TS: Her cold came to the library.
  tr TS: Soğuk algınlığı kütüphaneye kadar geldi.
  EN FS: Her cold came to the cinema.
  tr FS: Soğuk algınlığı sinemaya kadar geldi.
  EN TP: a cold in the library
  tr TP: kütüphanede soğuk algınlığı
  EN FP: a cold in the snow
  tr FP: karda soğuk algınlığı
4576 | count (verb): to find out the number or amount of something | loc: saymak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is counting a mountain of paper.
  tr TS: Bir dağ kadar kâğıt sayıyor.
  EN FS: She is counting a mountain of coins.
  tr FS: Bir dağ kadar bozuk para sayıyor.
  EN TP: counting sheets of paper
  tr TP: kâğıt yapraklarını saymak
  EN FP: counting coins on a table
  tr FP: masada bozuk para saymak
4577 | country (noun): the territory of a nation | loc: ülke
  EN TS: She is showing us her country.
  tr TS: Bize ülkesini gösteriyor.
  EN FS: She is showing us her ship.
  tr FS: Bize gemisini gösteriyor.
  EN TP: a country of fields
  tr TP: tarlalarla dolu bir ülke
  EN FP: a country house
  tr FP: bir kır evi
4578 | crop (noun): what plants yield in one growing season | loc: mahsul
  EN TS: Crop fields form a patchwork.
  tr TS: Mahsul tarlaları yama işi gibi.
  EN FS: Car parks form a patchwork.
  tr FS: Otoparklar yama işi gibi.
  EN TP: fields of green crops
  tr TP: yeşil mahsul tarlaları
  EN FP: a crop of apples
  tr FP: bir elma mahsulü
4579 | abroad (adverb): to or in a foreign country | loc: yurt dışında
  EN TS: She travels abroad a lot!
  tr TS: Çok sık yurt dışına gidiyor!
  EN FS: She stays at home a lot!
  tr FS: Çok sık evde kalıyor!
  EN TP: travelling abroad
  tr TP: yurt dışında seyahat etmek
  EN FP: studying abroad
  tr FP: yurt dışında okumak
4580 | date (noun): a meeting arranged in advance | loc: randevu
  EN TS: Their date has one milkshake.
  tr TS: Randevularında tek bir milkshake var.
  EN FS: Their date has one pizza.
  tr FS: Randevularında tek bir pizza var.
  EN TP: a milkshake date
  tr TP: milkshake'li bir randevu
  EN FP: the date on a calendar
  tr FP: takvimdeki tarih
4581 | candy (noun): a sweet made of flavored sugar | loc: şeker
  EN TS: A blanket den full of candy.
  tr TS: Şekerle dolu bir battaniye kalesi.
  EN FS: A blanket den full of books.
  tr FS: Kitapla dolu bir battaniye kalesi.
  EN TP: a bowl of candy
  tr TP: bir kase şeker
  EN FP: a candy shop window
  tr FP: bir şekerci vitrini
4582 | measure (verb): to find the size or measurements of something | loc: ölçmek | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: An adult is measuring them.
  tr TS: Bir yetişkin onları ölçüyor.
  EN FS: An adult is feeding them.
  tr FS: Bir yetişkin onları besliyor.
  EN TP: to measure who is taller
  tr TP: kimin daha uzun olduğunu ölçmek
  EN FP: to measure a room
  tr FP: bir odayı ölçmek
4583 | calf (noun): the thick muscle at the back of your lower leg | loc: baldır
  EN TS: Ouch! He is holding his calf.
  tr TS: Ah! Baldırını tutuyor.
  EN FS: Ouch! He is holding his head.
  tr FS: Ah! Başını tutuyor.
  EN TP: a cramp in his calf
  tr TP: baldırında kramp
  EN FP: a calf in a field
  tr FP: tarlada bir buzağı
4584 | trail (noun): a track or mark left by something passing | loc: iz
  EN TS: The turtle left a trail.
  tr TS: Kaplumbağa bir iz bıraktı.
  EN FS: The crab left a trail.
  tr FS: Yengeç bir iz bıraktı.
  EN TP: a trail of flipper prints
  tr TP: yüzgeç izlerinden bir iz
  EN FP: a hiking trail
  tr FP: bir yürüyüş parkuru
4585 | crossing (noun): traveling across something | loc: geçiş
  EN TS: Beret, baguette, stylish crossing.
  tr TS: Bere, baget, şık bir geçiş.
  EN FS: Beret, guitar, stylish crossing.
  tr FS: Bere, gitar, şık bir geçiş.
  EN TP: a crossing with a baguette
  tr TP: bagetle bir geçiş
  EN FP: a border crossing by car
  tr FP: arabayla sınır geçişi
4586 | crosswalk (noun): the striped part of a road for crossing | loc: yaya geçidi
  EN TS: She is on the crosswalk.
  tr TS: Yaya geçidinde yürüyor.
  EN FS: She is on the bridge.
  tr FS: Köprüde yürüyor.
  EN TP: a busy Paris crosswalk
  tr TP: kalabalık bir Paris yaya geçidi
  EN FP: a crosswalk in the snow
  tr FP: karda bir yaya geçidi
4587 | cyclist (noun): a person who rides a bicycle | loc: bisikletçi
  EN TS: No way! The cyclist is surprised.
  tr TS: Olamaz! Bisikletçi şaşkın.
  EN FS: No way! The cyclist is sleeping.
  tr FS: Olamaz! Bisikletçi uyuyor.
  EN TP: a cyclist at a junction
  tr TP: kavşakta bir bisikletçi
  EN FP: a cyclist at a race
  tr FP: yarışta bir bisikletçi
4588 | traffic (noun): the vehicles and people moving along a place | loc: trafik
  EN TS: The traffic is stopped.
  tr TS: Trafik durmuş.
  EN FS: The traffic is moving.
  tr FS: Trafik akıyor.
  EN TP: stopped traffic at night
  tr TP: gece duran trafik
  EN FP: heavy traffic in the day
  tr FP: gündüz yoğun trafik
4589 | pedestrian (noun): a person walking in the street, not driving | loc: yaya
  EN TS: So many pedestrians!
  tr TS: Ne çok yaya!
  EN FS: So many cyclists!
  tr FS: Ne çok bisikletçi!
  EN TP: pedestrians on a junction
  tr TP: kavşakta yayalar
  EN FP: a pedestrian zone with shops
  tr FP: dükkânlı bir yaya bölgesi
4590 | vacation (noun): leisure time away from work for rest or fun | loc: tatil
  EN TS: Vacation mode: big splash!
  tr TS: Tatil modu: suya cup!
  EN FS: Vacation mode: long nap!
  tr FS: Tatil modu: uzun bir şekerleme!
  EN TP: a vacation on a ship
  tr TP: gemide bir tatil
  EN FP: a vacation on a train
  tr FP: trende bir tatil
4591 | ship (noun): a large vessel that carries passengers or goods | loc: gemi
  EN TS: The ship offers a pool on the top deck.
  tr TS: Geminin üst güvertesinde havuz var.
  EN FS: The ship offers a cinema on the top deck.
  tr FS: Geminin üst güvertesinde sinema var.
  EN TP: a big passenger ship
  tr TP: büyük bir yolcu gemisi
  EN FP: a big cargo ship
  tr FP: büyük bir yük gemisi
4592 | foot (noun): the part of the leg below the ankle | loc: ayak
  EN TS: Wine made with feet. Tasty?
  tr TS: Ayakla yapılan şarap. Lezzetli mi?
  EN FS: Beer made with feet. Tasty?
  tr FS: Ayakla yapılan bira. Lezzetli mi?
  EN TP: bare feet in grapes
  tr TP: üzümlerin içinde çıplak ayaklar
  EN FP: bare feet in the sand
  tr FP: kumda çıplak ayaklar
4593 | hospital (noun): a health facility where patients get treatment | loc: hastane
  EN TS: He is walking in the hospital.
  tr TS: Hastanede yürüyor.
  EN FS: He is running in the hospital.
  tr FS: Hastanede koşuyor.
  EN TP: a long hospital corridor
  tr TP: uzun bir hastane koridoru
  EN FP: a hospital car park
  tr FP: hastane otoparkı
